THE  IMPORTATION  OF  CANADIAN  BEEF  THAT 
COMES  FROM  ANIMALS  OLDER  THAN  30 
MONTHS  OF  AGE

S.  HRG.  110–78

FIELD  HEARING

BEFORE THE

SUBCOMMITTEE ON INTERSTATE COMMERCE, 

TRADE, AND TOURISM

OF THE

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE
ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS

FIRST  SESSION

FEBRUARY  21,  2007

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation

(

35–813 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2007

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2250 Mail: Stop SSOP, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  15:54 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 035813 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35813.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS

FIRST  SESSION

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Vice  Chairman 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Policy  Director 

MARGARET SPRING,  Democratic  General  Counsel 
LISA J.  SUTHERLAND,  Republican  Staff  Director 

CHRISTINE D.  KURTH,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director 

KENNETH R.  NAHIGIAN,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

SUBCOMMITTEE  ON  INTERSTATE  COMMERCE,  TRADE,  AND  TOURISM 

BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota, 

Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 

JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina,  Ranking 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 

(II)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  15:54 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 035813 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35813.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on February 21, 2007 .......................................................................
Statement of Senator Dorgan .................................................................................

WITNESSES 

Barth, Elwood ‘‘Woody’’, State Secretary, North Dakota Farmers Union ...........
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Becker,  Patrick,  President,  Independent  Beef  Association  of  North  Dakota 
(I–BAND); Cow/Calf Producer .............................................................................
DeHaven, Dr. Ron, Administrator, Animal and Plant Health Inspection Serv-
ice (APHIS), Department of Agriculture ............................................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Froelich,  Kelly,  Director,  Independent  Beef  Association  of  North  Dakota  (I–
BAND); Cow/Calf Producer .................................................................................
Froelich, Hon. Rod, Representative (District 31), State of North Dakota Legis-
lature .....................................................................................................................
Huseth, Mark, President, North Dakota Stockmen’s Association .......................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Johnson,  Roger,  Commissioner,  North  Dakota  Department  of  Agriculture; 
accompanied by Dr. Susan Keller, North Dakota State Veterinarian .............
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Keller,  Dwight,  Vice  President,  American  Simmental  Association;  Cow/Calf 
Producer ................................................................................................................
Kinev, Larry, Cow/Calf Producer ...........................................................................
Krueger, James E., Cow/Calf Producer ..................................................................
Lund,  Allen,  Secretary,  Independent  Beef  Association  of  North  Dakota  (I–
BAND); Cow/Calf Producer .................................................................................
McDonnell,  Jr.,  Leo  R.,  Former  President/Co-Founder,  Ranchers-Cattlemen 
Action Legal Fund, United Stockgrowers of America (R–CALF USA) ............
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Orts,  Dorothy,  President,  Galloway  Association  of  the  North  Dakota  Stock-
men’s Association; Cow/Calf Producer ................................................................
Schmidt, James, Cow/Calf Producer ......................................................................
Schumacher,  Herman,  Co-Founder,  Ranchers-Cattlemen  Action  Legal  Fund, 
United  Stockgrowers  of  America  (R–CALF  USA);  Co-Owner,  Herreid  Live-
stock Market .........................................................................................................

Page 
1
1

28
29

47

6
8

48

41
16
18

12
14

45
45
44

43

20
22

48
44

44

(III)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  15:54 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 035813 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35813.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  15:54 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 035813 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35813.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

THE  IMPORTATION  OF  CANADIAN  BEEF  THAT 
COMES  FROM  ANIMALS  OLDER  THAN  30 
MONTHS  OF  AGE 

WEDNESDAY,  FEBRUARY  21,  2007

SUBCOMMITTEE ON INTERSTATE COMMERCE, TRADE, AND 
TOURISM, 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

U.S. SENATE, 

The  Subcommittee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  10:07  a.m.  in  the 
Missouri  Room,  Bismarck  State  College,  Hon.  Byron  L.  Dorgan, 
Chairman of the Subcommittee, presiding. 

Bismarck, ND. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. BYRON L. DORGAN,

U.S. SENATOR FROM NORTH DAKOTA 

Senator  DORGAN.  We’ll  call  the  hearing  to  order.  I’m  Senator 
Byron  Dorgan  from  North  Dakota.  This  is  a  hearing  of  the  Sub-
committee  of  the  U.S.  Senate  Commerce  Committee.  The  Sub-
committee  that  I  chair  includes  the  interstate  commerce  issues  as 
part  of  its  jurisdiction.  The  Ranking  Member  of  my  Subcommittee 
is  Senator  DeMint  from  South  Carolina.  He’s  not  able  to  be  with 
me today, but I want to thank all of you for coming. 

This hearing will include a number of witnesses, following which 
we  will  have  an  open  microphone,  as  you  see  in  the  middle  of  the 
room,  to  hear  some  of  your  comments.  My  hope  would  be  to  finish 
the hearing in 2 hours, but we’ll see how that goes. 

Let  me  describe  why  I’m  here  and  why  I’ve  called  this  hearing. 
There is a proposal by the Department of Agriculture to expand the 
imports of live cattle from Canada over 30 months of age and boxed 
beef  from  animals  of  any  age  coming  from  Canada,  and  that  pro-
posal  is  very  controversial.  I  have  spoken  publicly  in  opposition  to 
the proposal. 

There  is  now  a  public  comment  period  on  the  proposal  until 
March 12th, and I felt it appropriate to hold a hearing on the sub-
ject now. This is a very important issue to a very important indus-
try in our country. 

We  have  the  Department  of  Agriculture  (USDA)  with  us  today. 
The head of the USDA’s Animal and Plant Health Inspection Serv-
ice, Dr. DeHaven, is with us. We have other witnesses I have asked 
to  make  statements  this  morning.  I  will  ask  questions  of  the  wit-
nesses,  and  as  I  indicated,  following  that  we  will  have  an  open 
microphone for the hearing. 

(1)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  15:54 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 035813 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35813.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

2

David  Strickland  is  the  principal  staffer  with  me  today  from  the 

Senate Commerce Committee. David, thank you for being here. 

Mr. STRICKLAND. Thank you, sir. 
Senator DORGAN. I’m going to give a statement at the opening to 
describe why this is an important issue and share my perspectives 
and some of the perspectives of others on the subject. 

The  beef  industry  is  the  largest  segment  of  America’s  agricul-
tural industry. About a million family farmers and ranchers in this 
country raise beef in all of our 50 states. North Dakota has 1.7-mil-
lion  head  of  cattle  on  11,700  farms  and  ranches,  and  the  beef  in-
dustry  contributes  about  $600,000,000  a  year  to  this  state’s  econ-
omy. It’s a big deal, and any of us who have traveled much around 
North Dakota understand the consequences of this industry. 

In  May  of  2003  the  U.S.  closed  the  border  to  live  cattle  coming 
in from Canada when a cow from Alberta, Canada, was discovered 
to  have  BSE,  better  known  as  mad  cow  disease.  The  first  animal 
with  BSE  was  the  first  native  cow  to  be  found  in  North  America. 
Unfortunately,  it  was  not  the  last  cow.  There  have  been  12  native 
cases  of  BSE  found  in  North  America,  and  10  of  them  have  been 
in Canadian animals. 

Here  is  a  chart  that  shows  the  history  of  this  from  March  20, 
2003,  through  Thursday,  February  8th,  this  month,  in  which  Can-
ada  found  the—I  say  tenth  case  of  BSE  because  the  cow  in  Wash-
ington State with BSE was actually a Canadian cow. So we’re talk-
ing about ten head of cattle in a relatively short period of time. 

[The information referred to follows:]

Timeline of BSE Cases in North America 

May  20,  2003:  Canada  finds  1st  native  case  in  an  animal  born  in  March  1997.
December 23, 2003: Canada’s 2nd BSE case is found in Washington State.
January 2, 2005: Canada finds 3rd BSE case.
January  11,  2005:  Canada  finds  4th  BSE  case  in  an  animal  born  after  feed  ban.
June 24, 2005: U.S. finds 1st native-born BSE case in a 12-year-old cow.
January  22,  2006:  Canada  finds  5th  BSE  case  in  an  animal  born  after  feed  ban.
March 13, 2006: U.S. finds 2nd BSE case in a 10-year-old cow.
April 16, 2006: Canada finds 6th BSE case in an animal born after feed ban.
July 4, 2006: Canada finds 7th BSE case.
July 13, 2006: Canada finds 8th BSE case in an animal born after feed ban.
August 23, 2006: Canada finds 9th BSE case.
Thursday, February 8, 2007: Canada finds 10th BSE case.

Now,  I  want  to  show  you  the  consequences  of  all  of  this.  As  you 
know, USDA Prime is the best label you can have on a cut of beef. 
It  means  that  cut  of  meat  has  been  certified  by  USDA  as  among 
the  most  choice  cuts  of  beef,  and  American  beef  has  largely  been 
recognized as the safest in the world because of our inspection sys-
tem  and  because  of  what  we  have  done  to  make  sure  that  reputa-
tion  exists.  None  of  us  want  to  do  anything  that  would  jeopardize 
that reputation. 

Now,  let  me  talk  about  the  imports  of  Canadian  beef  over  the 
last decade, and this chart shows what has happened. You’ll see we 
were  up  to  1.7-million  head  per  year,  in  2002.  Immediately  after 
the  first  Canadian  cow  was  discovered,  we  shut  off  the  import  of 
Canadian cattle and beef to this country, and you can see the con-
sequences  of  that  were  pretty  dramatic.  And  then  cattle  under  30 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  15:54 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 035813 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35813.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

months  of  age  were  allowed  in  and  some  boxed  beef,  and  you  see 
these numbers climbing back up.

3

If  this  rule  is,  in  fact,  changed  that  Secretary  Johanns  and  the 
Administration want to change, we’ll see 1.3-million head of Cana-
dian cattle that will await import in 2007 under the new rule. That 
number comes from the U.S. Department of Agriculture (USDA). 

Now  this  shows  what  happened  to  our  beef  exports  as  a  result 
of these activities. As you can see in the 2003 period, shortly there-
after, it just dropped off the table. An unbelievable impact. In 2004 
we  exported  209,000  metric  tons  of  beef.  Our  share  of  the  world’s 
beef export was 3 percent. 

Prior  to  that  time  it  was  very  different,  with  18  percent  of  the 
world’s  beef  exports  coming  from  this  country.  One  in  every  five 
pounds  of  beef  that  was  exported  around  the  world  was  ours,  and 
1.1-million metric tons of beef were exported. That dropped precipi-
tously,  first  almost  to  zero  and  then  to  just  about  3  percent,  just 
after the mad cow disease was discovered in December 2003. 

Ranchers lost about $100 million a month nationally, and it was 

a pretty devastating time. 

As the next chart shows, another consequence of the animal that 
was  found  in  Washington  State,  again  a  Canadian  animal,  was 
that  Japan  closed  its  markets  to  American  beef  for  two-and-a-half 
years.  Japan  was  our  biggest  customer,  they’d  been  our  number 
one export market, and we lost them for two-and-a-half years.

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  15:54 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 035813 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35813.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
1
t
t

.

a
c

4

We’re  now  trading  with  them  again,  and  there  are  35  foreign 
countries that will accept U.S. beef now, and we’ve worked hard to 
make  that  happen,  but  they  will  not  accept  Canadian  beef. *  Some 
would  like  there  to  be  a  North  American  market  that  has  no  dis-
tinction. There ought to be a distinction, in my judgment. 

The  next  chart  shows  trade  with  South  Korea,  another  example 
of  the  trouble  we’ve  had.  We’ve  been  working  hard  to  try  to  get 
back  to  that  South  Korean  market  after  they  stopped  buying  U.S. 
beef December 2003. It took a long while to get them to open their 
market,  and  it  finally  happened  in  October  of  last  year.  But  we’ve 
run  into  trouble  with  them  turning  back  boxes  of  beef  coming  into 
South Korea. 

This  article  from  a  South  Korean  news  agency  says  this:  ‘‘The 
procedure  of  butchering  both  U.S.-raised  cattle  and  cattle  from 
neighboring  countries  is  commonplace  in  the  United  States.  It  has 
sparked concerns in South Korea because beef from Canada, which 
has  reported  numerous  mad  cow  cases,  could  be  included  by  mis-
take.’’ ** 

I make that point only to say that we don’t operate in a vacuum 
here,  and  if  we  don’t  have  country-of-origin  labeling,  don’t  have 
segregation,  don’t  have  the  kinds  of  things  that  will  give  our  cus-
tomers  overseas  confidence  of  what  they’re  buying,  then  we  bear 
the consequences of that financially. 

Next  chart,  please.  USDA  has  proposed  a  rule,  and  Secretary 
Johanns has been active in pushing it, to open this market, and as 
I indicated, there is now a comment period. 

* ‘‘Thirty-five  foreign  countries  accept  U.S.  beef,  but  not  Canadian  beef.’’—Canadian  Beef  Ex-

** Yonhap  News,  Wednesday,  July  26,  2006,  article  entitled,  S.  Korean  Undecided  on  Timing 

port Federation Newsletter (January 2007). 

for Lifting of U.S. Beef Ban: Official. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  15:54 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 035813 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35813.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
2
t
t

.

a
c

5

Let me tell you about the Harvard study that was done. ‘‘The ex-
pected  number  of  infected  cattle  in  the  U.S.  over  20  years  as  a  re-
sult of importing cattle from Canada would amount to 21 animals. 
Most of those infected animals (approximately 90 percent) would be 
imported  directly,  while  the  remaining  10  percent  would  represent 
secondary infections (i.e., native U.S. cases).’’

The  point  is  that  a  reputable  study  of  this  situation  shows  that 
we are going to be importing a problem, a problem for our market. 
And  while  my  heart  breaks  for  the  Canadian  ranchers,  you  know, 
I  understand  how  awful  this  must  be  for  them,  our  first  responsi-
bility is for our domestic industry, for this country’s interests. That 
must be our first responsibility. 

Dr.  DeHaven,  who  is  with  us  today—and  he  can  respond  to 
this—is  quoted,  as  saying  ‘‘Considering  Canada  has  roughly  5.5 
million  [head  of]  cattle  over  24  months  of  age,  under  OIE  guide-
lines,  they  could  detect  up  to  11  cases  of  BSE  in  this  population 
and still be considered a minimal-risk country.’’

That  minimal-risk  issue  might  well  be  the  case  with  respect  to 
this  assignment  of  words,  but  that  is  not  the  case  with  respect  to 
those  with  whom  we  want  to  trade  and  those  to  whom  we  expect 
to  be  able  to  sell  American  beef.  They  will  not  view  this  as  mini-
mal-risk  with  respect  to  a  marketplace  in  which  we  have  1.3-mil-
lion head of Canadian cattle coming down across the border. 

Now,  let  me  make  a  couple  of  final  points.  I  understand  this  is 
a  very  controversial  issue,  and  I  have  been  very  concerned  about 
opening  this  border  quickly  and  precipitously.  I’ve  been  one  of 
those  who  has  fought  for  a  good  number  of  years  for  something 
called country-of-origin labeling, and I know there are some people 
who don’t like that. 

Consumers  can  find  out  where  their  shoes  come  from,  where 
their  T-shirts  come  from.  There  are  labels  on  everything,  but  you 
can’t  find  out  where  your  piece  of  meat  comes  from  when  you  buy 
it at the grocery store, and that’s wrong. 

So we enact country-of-origin labeling; it is the law. And then the 
USDA  drags  their  feet  for  2  years  to  implement  it  because  they 
don’t  like  it,  and  then  at  midnight  a  provision  is  stuck  in  a  bill  to 
delay  it  by  another  2  years.  But  we’re  going  to  try  very  hard  this 
year  to  get  that  done,  to  finally  force  country-of-origin  labeling  to 
be  implemented.  It  makes  no  sense  to  me  under  any  circumstance 
to  allow  the  influx  of  1.3-million  Canadian  cattle  at  a  time  when 
we have not been willing to do country-of-origin labeling; and even 
then  if  the  acceptance  of  cattle  from  Canada  is  going  to  bring  into 
this  country  additional  cases  of  BSE  or  mad  cow  disease,  it  will 
have significant consequences on our beef market. And as I said be-
fore,  our  first  responsibility  is  to  our  industry  and  our  economic 
well-being.  That  is  not  being  protectionist.  That’s  just  using  some 
common  sense.  So  I’m  holding  this  hearing  to  solicit  some  testi-
mony.  I  know  that  we’re  a  big  livestock  state.  We  care  a  lot  about 
these  issues,  all  of  us  do,  and  I  also  know  that  Secretary  Johanns 
is  proceeding  ahead  and  he  intends  to  open  this  market  if  he  can. 
The  period  is  still  open  for  comments,  and  we’re  going  to  con-
tinue  to  do  a  number  of  things,  including  holding  this  hearing,  to 
try  to  get  all  of  the  facts  on  the  table  so  that  we  understand  the 
consequences of what’s being proposed. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  15:54 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 035813 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35813.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

6

Now  that’s  the  prelude.  I’m  sorry  it  took  as  long  as  it  did,  but 
I  wanted  to  at  least  set  the  stage.  You  can  see  by  the  graphs  that 
foreign demand has fallen off the table, and all of the consequences 
of these issues. 

We  have  a  number  of  witnesses  with  us  today,  and  I’m  very  ap-
preciative  of  them  being  here.  Dr.  Ron  DeHaven  is  the  Adminis-
trator  of  the  Animal  and  Plant  Health  Inspection  Service,  USDA, 
in Washington, D.C. Mark Huseth is President of the North Dakota 
Stockmen’s  Association.  Roger  Johnson  is  the  North  Dakota  Agri-
cultural  Commissioner.  He’s  accompanied  by  Dr.  Keller,  the  State 
Veterinarian. Elwood Barth is Secretary and Board Member of the 
North  Dakota  Farmers  Union.  Mr.  Leo  McDonnell  is  former  Presi-
dent and Co-Founder of R–CALF USA, who is also a North Dakota 
rancher. 

I  want  to  thank  all  of  you  for  being  here.  I  am  going  to  ask  Dr. 
DeHaven  to  begin,  and  following  the  testimony  of  witnesses  I  in-
tend  to  ask  a  series  of  questions.  Following  that  we  will  have  an 
open microphone period. I would ask that you summarize your tes-
timony for us, in five to seven minutes. 

Dr. DeHaven, thank you again. 

STATEMENT OF DR. RON DEHAVEN, ADMINISTRATOR, ANIMAL 
(APHIS),

AND  PLANT  HEALTH 
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE 
Dr.  DEHAVEN.  Chairman  Dorgan,  thank  you  for  the  opportunity 
to provide information on the U.S. Department of Agriculture’s pro-
posed  rule  to  amend  the  minimal-risk  region  regulation  for  bovine 
spongiform encephalopathy, or BSE. 

INSPECTION  SERVICE 

In  January  2005  the  USDA  published  a  final  rule  that  estab-
lished conditions for the importation of live cattle younger than 30 
months of age and certain other commodities from minimal-risk re-
gions for BSE. A minimal-risk region can include a region in which 
BSE-infected  animals  have  been  diagnosed,  but  where  sufficient 
risk-mitigation measures have been put in place to make the intro-
duction  of  BSE  into  the  United  States  unlikely.  This  rule  des-
ignated Canada as the first minimal-risk country recognized by the 
Department of Agriculture. 

Our  current  proposal  published  on  January  9,  2007,  would  ex-
pand  the  scope  of  this  2005  rule  to  facilitate  fair,  science-based 
trade  consistent  with  international  standards  as  defined  by  the 
World Organization for Animal Health, or the OIE. 

The  rule  proposes  allowing  the  importation  of  bovine  blood  and 
blood products, bovine casings and part of the small intestine, and 
live bovines for any use born after March 1, 1999. This is the date 
that we have determined to be the date of an effective enforcement 
of the ruminant-to-ruminant feed ban in Canada. 

The  public  comment  period  on  these  proposed  actions,  as  you 
have indicated, will close on March 12th, and I want to encourage, 
along with you, that all stakeholders be part of our decisionmaking 
process  by  providing  feedback  through  the  submission  of  public 
comments. 

Science  played  a  central  role  in  the  development  of  the  regula-
tion,  particularly  with  regard  to  the  rigorous  evaluation  of  risk. 
Sound science continues to guide our proposed actions. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  15:54 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 035813 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35813.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

7

The  single  most  important  thing  that  we  can  do  to  protect 
human  health  is  the  removal  of  specified  risk  materials,  or  SRMs, 
from the food supply. SRMs are those tissues that could be infected 
from  a  cow  that  is  in  fact  infected  with  BSE.  Likewise,  the  most 
significant  step  that  we  can  take  to  prevent  the  spread  of  BSE  in 
the  animal  population  and  bring  about  its  eradication  is  the  rumi-
nant-to-ruminant feed ban. 

International standards as defined by the OIE served as our ref-
erence  in  developing  this  minimal-risk  region  regulation  and  they 
continue to guide our proposed actions. 

The  OIE  recommends  the  use  of  risk  assessment  to  manage 
human and animal health risks of BSE. The OIE guidelines recog-
nize  that  there  are  different  levels  of  risk  in  countries  or  regions 
and  suggest  how  trade  may  safely  occur  according  to  those  levels 
of risk. 

As  we’ve  moved  forward  in  issuing  the  proposed  changes,  our 
risk  assessment  continues  to  include  careful  consideration  of  the 
entire  risk  pathway—all  of  the  steps  in  both  Canada  and  the 
United  States  that  must  occur  for  BSE  to  spread  to  an  animal  in 
our  country.  I  want  to  stress  that  one  individual  step  cannot  be 
considered to represent the entire risk pathway. In short, we found 
that the risk to the United States by allowing these additional ani-
mals and commodities from Canada is negligible. 

The  risk  assessment  took  into  careful  consideration  the  possi-
bility  that  Canada  could  experience  additional  cases  of  BSE.  Our 
risk  assessment  acknowledges  that  BSE  is  present  in  Canada  at 
this  time.  We  estimated  the  prevalence  of  BSE  in  the  Canadian 
cattle herd using the exact same methods we used to determine the 
prevalence of BSE in the U.S. herd. We then used this estimate of 
prevalence  to  help  assess  the  likelihood  that  BSE  would  be  intro-
duced into the United States from Canada over an extended period 
of  time.  We  found  that  from  a  practical  standpoint  the  risk  to  the 
United  States  via  trade  in  animals  and  products  with  Canada  is 
negligible. 

The  OIE  standards  recognize  that  trade  can  safely  be  conducted 
with  countries  that  have  BSE  present  in  their  cattle  populations. 
Our proposed rule is consistent with these international standards. 
The  majority  of  imports  from  Canada  are  expected  to  be  less 
than  2  years  of  age  at  the  time  of  import.  Our  expectation  is  that 
BSE prevalence will continue to decrease given Canada’s ruminant-
to-ruminant  feed  ban,  which  has  been  in  place  since  August  1997. 
Combined  with  the  mitigative  effects  of  both  import  requirements 
and the young age of most animals at the time of import, the likeli-
hood of a BSE animal being imported is minimal. 

In addition, the series of strong risk mitigation measures in place 
in  our  country  would  make  it  highly  unlikely  that  the  disease 
would infect a U.S. animal. 

We  also  recognize  that  there  have  been  cases  in  animals  born 
after  March  1,  1999.  These  cases  are  not  unexpected,  nor  do  we 
consider  such  diagnoses  to  undercut  our  conclusion  that  March  1, 
1999,  can  be  considered  the  date  of  effective  enforcement  of  the 
feed ban in Canada. 

Experience  worldwide  has  demonstrated  that,  even  in  countries 
with  a  feed  ban  in  place,  BSE  has  occurred  in  cattle  born  after  a 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  15:54 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 035813 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35813.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

8

feed ban was implemented. But such isolated incidents do not con-
tribute to further significant spread of BSE. 

As part of the original minimal-risk rule an evaluation was done 
that  concluded  Canada’s  feed  ban  is  effectively  enforced.  Our  pro-
posed—in  our  proposed  rule  we  considered  when  full  implementa-
tion  and  effective  enforcement  of  the  Canadian  feed  ban  was 
achieved.  Full  implementation  occurred  after  completion  of  an  ini-
tial  implementation  period  and  then  after  sufficient  time  had 
elapsed  to  allow  most  feed  products  to  cycle  through  their  system. 
So  in  following  the  OIE  standards,  we  identified  March  1,  1999, 
as  the  date  when  Canada’s  feed  ban  became  effective.  We  are  not 
defining  effective  to  mean  100  percent  compliance  or  that  there  is 
no  possibility  for  human  error  through  that  process,  nor  does  it 
mean  that  no  affected  animals  will  be  born  after  this  date.  Again, 
despite  feed  bans  in  many  countries,  affected  animals  continue  to 
be found, but at a dramatically declining rate. 

Senator  our  proposed  actions  are  an  important  move  in  our  ef-
forts  to  promote  fair,  science-based  trade  practices.  I  am  confident 
in  saying  that  we  can  take  this  next  step  while  at  the  same  time 
protecting American agriculture and maintaining confidence in the 
U.S. beef supply. 

I would be happy to answer your questions later in the program. 

Thank you. 

[The prepared statement of Dr. DeHaven follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DR. RON DEHAVEN, ADMINISTRATOR, ANIMAL AND PLANT 

HEALTH INSPECTION SERVICE (APHIS), DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE 

Chairman Dorgan, thank you for the opportunity to be here today to provide you 
information on my agency’s proposed rule to amend the minimal-risk region regula-
tion  for  bovine  spongiform  encephalopathy  (BSE)  to  allow  the  importation  of 
ruminants over 30 months of age from minimal-risk regions. Currently, only Canada 
has received that designation. 

In  developing  this  proposal,  we  very  carefully  reviewed  all  the  scientific  informa-
tion  available  to  us  and  built  upon  the  extensive  analysis  we  conducted  in  writing 
the  initial  minimal-risk  region  regulation.  Our  regulatory  actions  are  consistent 
with  the  guidance  on  BSE  provided  by  the  World  Organization  for  Animal  Health, 
or the OIE. The OIE guidelines, which I will describe further in a moment, promote 
safe trade in live animals and animal products based on how countries manage the 
known risk factors associated with the disease. 

Our  proposal,  which  remains  open  for  public  comment  until  March  12,  is  appro-
priate  from  both  a  scientific  and  practical  standpoint  and  I  appreciate  the  oppor-
tunity to share information with you on both these fronts. 
USDA’s Minimal Risk Region Regulation 

As you know, in January 2005, USDA published a final rule that established con-
ditions for the importation of live cattle younger than 30 months of age and certain 
other commodities from minimal-risk regions for BSE. A minimal-risk region can in-
clude a region in which BSE-infected animals have been diagnosed, but where suffi-
cient  risk-mitigation  measures  have  been  put  in  place  so  that  the  importation  of 
ruminants  and  ruminant  products  will  present  a  minimal-risk  of  introducing  BSE 
into the United States. This rule designated Canada as the first minimal-risk coun-
try recognized by USDA. 

Before discussing our current proposal, let me go back and discuss the central role 
science played in the development of the regulation, particularly with regard to the 
rigorous evaluation of risk. 

Since  the  discovery  of  the  first  case  of  BSE  in  Great  Britain  in  1986,  we  have 
learned  a  tremendous  amount  about  this  disease.  That  knowledge  has  greatly  in-
formed our regulatory systems and response efforts. 

We have learned that the single most important thing we can do to protect human 
health regarding BSE is the removal from the food supply of specified risk materials 
(SRMs)—those  tissues  that,  according  to  the  available  scientific  evidence,  could  be 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  15:54 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 035813 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35813.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

9

infective in a cow with BSE. USDA’s Food Safety and Inspection Service (FSIS) en-
forces  this  ban  domestically  and  ensures  that  all  countries  exporting  beef  to  the 
United States comply with the SRM ban. Likewise, the most significant step we can 
take  to  prevent  the  spread  of  BSE  and  bring  about  its  eradication  in  the  animal 
population is the ruminant-to-ruminant feed ban. It is because of the strong systems 
the United States has put in place, especially these two essential firewalls, that we 
can  be  confident  of  the  safety  of  our  beef  supply  and  that  the  spread  of  BSE  has 
been prevented in this Nation. 

USDA  has  conducted  a  comprehensive  risk  analysis  to  support  the  January  2005 
regulatory  changes,  and  updated  the  analysis  when  the  comment  period  was  re-
opened  and  again  when  the  rule  was  made  final.  This  analysis  drew  on  findings 
from the Harvard-Tuskegee BSE risk assessment, findings from the epidemiological 
investigation of BSE in Canada, information on Canadian BSE surveillance and feed 
ban, and history of Canadian imports of cattle and meat and bone meal from coun-
tries known to have BSE. 

The results of that analysis confirmed that Canada has the necessary safeguards 
in  place  to  protect  U.S.  consumers  and  livestock  against  BSE.  These  mitigation 
measures  include  the  removal  of  SRMs  from  the  food  chain  supply,  a  ruminant-to-
ruminant feed ban, a national surveillance program, and appropriate, science-based 
import restrictions. Additionally, the extensive risk assessment conducted as part of 
USDA’s  rulemaking  process  took  into  careful  consideration  the  BSE  prevalence  in 
Canada and that Canada could identify additional cases of BSE. 
OIE Guidelines 

As  I  mentioned  earlier,  international  standards  as  defined  by  the  OIE  served  as 
a  reference  in  developing  the  minimal-risk  region  regulations  and  they  continue  to 
guide our proposed actions. 

These  international  standards  are  used  by  national  veterinary  authorities  to  pre-
vent  the  introduction  of  animal  diseases,  such  as  BSE,  while  avoiding  unjustified 
trade  barriers.  The  OIE  recommends  the  use  of  risk  assessment  to  manage  human 
and  animal  health  risks  of  BSE.  OIE  guidelines,  based  on  current  scientific  under-
standing, recognize that there are different levels of risk in countries or regions, and 
suggest how trade may safely occur according to the levels of risk. 

As  we’ve  moved  forward  in  issuing  the  proposed  changes  to  the  minimal-risk  re-
gion  regulation,  our  risk  assessment  continues  to  include  careful  consideration  of 
the  entire  risk  pathway—all  of  the  steps,  in  both  Canada  and  the  United  States, 
that  must  occur  for  BSE  to  be  spread  to  an  animal  here  in  the  United  States. 
APHIS conducted a thorough risk assessment and found that the risk to the United 
States  presented  by  allowing  these  additional  animals  and  commodities  from  Can-
ada is negligible. 
Proposed Changes to the Minimal Risk Region Regulation 

Our current proposal, published in the Federal Register on January 9, 2007, would 
expand  the  scope  of  the  2005  rule  to  facilitate  fair,  science-based  trade,  consistent 
with  international  standards  as  defined  by  the  World  Organization  for  Animal 
Health, or the OIE. 

Specifically, the rule proposes allowing the importation of live bovines for any use 
born on or after, March 1, 1999; blood and blood products derived from bovines, col-
lected under certain conditions; and casings and part of the small intestine derived 
from bovines. As I will discuss further in a few moments, March 1, 1999, is the date 
we have determined to be the date of effective enforcement of the ruminant-to-rumi-
nant feed ban in Canada. 

I’ll note here that meat and meat products from animals of any age, with specified 
risk  materials  removed,  were  addressed  in  the  January  2005  final  rule  that  estab-
lished the minimal-risk region classification. In March 2005, APHIS published a no-
tice  of  a  delay  of  applicability  of  certain  provisions  of  that  rule.  This  delay  affected 
only  meat  and  meat  products  from  animals  30  months  of  age  or  older.  If  the  pro-
posed  rule  published  on  January  9  is  made  final,  it  would  be  consistent  to  lift  the 
delay  and  also  allow  the  importation  of  products  derived  from  animals  over  30 
months of age into the United States. 

Again,  the  public  comment  period  on  these  proposed  actions  opened  January  9, 
and  will  close  on  March  12,  2007.  I  encourage  all  stakeholders  to  be  a  part  of  our 
decisionmaking  process  by  providing  feedback  through  submission  of  public  com-
ments. 
Analysis of Risk to U.S. Animal Health 

APHIS completed a comprehensive risk assessment to evaluate the risk presented 
by allowing the additional commodities outlined in the January 2007 proposal to be 
imported  from  minimal-risk  regions.  The  risk  assessment  breaks  down  the  possible 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  15:54 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 035813 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35813.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

10

pathways  for  the  establishment  of  BSE  in  the  U.S.  cattle  population  into  a  series 
of  steps  and  analyzes  the  likelihood  of  these  steps  in  the  process.  It  is  important 
to note that the impact of any specific step depends on its relationship to the other 
steps  in  the  pathway.  In  other  words,  one  individual  step  can  not  be  considered  to 
represent the entire risk pathway. 

As part of the risk assessment, we estimated the prevalence of BSE in the stand-
ing adult cattle population of Canada with the same methods that we recently used 
to  estimate  the  prevalence  of  BSE  in  the  United  States.  We  then  used  this  current 
estimate  of  prevalence  to  help  assess  the  likelihood  that  BSE  would  be  introduced 
into  the  United  States  over  an  extended  period  of  time.  We  chose  to  evaluate  what 
could  happen  over  the  next  20  years,  assuming  that  the  proposed  rule  would  apply 
into the foreseeable future. 

First  we  looked  at  the  most  likely  scenario.  Given  that  Canada  has  had  a  feed 
ban  in  place  since  1997  and  evidence  indicates  that  the  implementation  of  a  feed 
ban results in decreasing BSE prevalence, the most likely scenario is that BSE prev-
alence in Canada will continue to decrease over the next 20 years. 

This  decrease,  combined  with  the  mitigative  effects  of  our  import  requirements 
and the fact that the majority of imports from Canada are young animals that pose 
little  risk  of  harboring  BSE  due  to  the  disease’s  lengthy  incubation  period,  would 
continuously  decrease  the  possibility  that  infected  animals  would  be  imported  over 
the  20-year  period.  Under  this  scenario,  then,  the  likelihood  of  BSE  exposure  and 
establishment  in  the  U.S.  cattle  population  as  a  consequence  of  importing  infected 
Canadian cattle is negligible. 

We then considered other less likely scenarios that may over-estimate the overall 
risk.  In  these  less  likely  scenarios,  we  assumed  that  BSE  prevalence  in  Canada 
would remain constant during the next 20 years. 

This  would  mean  the  continued  detection  of  infected  animals—born  after  the  im-
plementation  of  the  feed  ban—during  the  entire  20-year  time  frame.  Even  with 
these less likely scenarios, our assessment indicates that BSE will not be spread or 
become established in the United States as a result of the proposal. 

The  majority  of  imports  from  Canada  are  expected  to  be  less  than  2  years  of  age 
at  the  time  of  import.  With  the  expectation  that  BSE  prevalence  will  continue  to 
decrease,  and  the  mitigative  effects  of  both  the  import  requirements  and  the  young 
age  of  animals  at  the  time  of  import,  the  likelihood  of  a  BSE  positive  animal  being 
imported  is  minimal.  In  addition,  the  series  of  strong  risk  mitigation  measures  in 
place  in  our  country  would  make  it  highly  unlikely  that  the  disease  would  infect 
a U.S. animal. 
Analysis of Risk to U.S. Public Health 

Although  our  risk  assessment  was  conducted  to  evaluate  animal  health  risks,  we 
did  use  one  model  in  our  assessment  to  also  consider  possible  impacts  on  public 
health. The results of this model also indicated that these potential impacts are ex-
tremely low. 

As  you  know,  public  health  in  the  United  States  is  protected  through  slaughter 
practices, including the removal of specified-risk materials, and the ruminant-to-ru-
minant feed ban. 

In conclusion, for all commodities considered under the current proposal, the risk 
of  BSE  infectivity  is  negligible  and  the  disease  will  not  become  established  in  the 
United  States.  This  is  true  even  if  Canada  identifies  additional  cases  of  BSE  and 
even if infected animals were to be imported to the United States. 
BSE Cases in Canada 

From the time of detection of the first native case of BSE in Canada in May 2003, 
10  cases  of  Canadian-born  BSE-infected  cattle  have  been  identified.  Nine  of  these 
cases have been detected in Canada, and the other case was in a native-born animal 
exported to the United States, which tested positive for BSE in December 2003. The 
most  recent  case  was  detected  in  a  mature  bull  from  Alberta  on  February  8,  2007. 
Right  from  the  start,  we’ve  had  an  excellent  working  relationship  with  Canada 
that has enabled us to participate directly in several of their epidemiological inves-
tigations  and  receive  all  of  the  information  we  have  needed  to  conduct  the  various 
risk analysis and regulatory work I’m discussing with you today. 

All  of  the  cases  of  BSE  in  Canada,  save  for  the  most  recent,  are  considered  in 
our  prevalence  estimate.  However,  let  me  stress  that  the  model  used  for  that  esti-
mate is much broader than simply evaluating the number of cases detected. As men-
tioned  previously,  we  used  that  same  model  in  our  estimate  of  the  prevalence  of 
BSE in the United States. That analysis documented the fact that identifying addi-
tional  cases  of  BSE  over  time  does  not  significantly  impact  the  overall  estimate  of 
prevalence, because the model incorporates a wide range of epidemiological informa-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  15:54 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 035813 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35813.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

11

tion  and  assumptions.  The  same  principle  would  apply  to  our  use  of  the  model  in 
estimating  the  prevalence  in  Canada—i.e.,  the  identification  of  additional  cases 
would not significantly change the prevalence estimate. 

We  also  recognize  that  there  have  been  cases  in  animals  born  after  the  date  pro-
posed  in  our  regulation  as  when  the  feed  ban  was  effectively  enforced.  Let  me  say 
that these cases are not unexpected, nor do we consider such diagnoses in any way 
to  undercut  our  conclusion  that  March  1,  1999  can  be  considered  the  date  of  effec-
tive  enforcement  of  the  feed  ban  in  Canada.  Let  me  also  say  that  this  is  an  area 
in  which  I  invite  all  interested  stakeholders  to  contribute  to  our  decisionmaking 
process and provide us with their comments before March 12. 

Experience  worldwide  has  demonstrated  that,  even  in  countries  with  a  feed  ban 
in place, BSE has occurred in cattle born after a feed ban was implemented. No reg-
ulatory  effort  can  ensure  100  percent  compliance  or  avoid  human  error.  But  such 
isolated  incidents  do  not  contribute  to  further  significant  spread  of  BSE,  especially 
when considered along with the series of other strong risk mitigations in place. 

Our  risk  assessment  acknowledges  that  BSE  is  present  in  Canada  at  this  time. 
From a practical standpoint, however, the risk to the United States via trade in ani-
mals and products is negligible. 

OIE  guidelines  recognize  that  trade  can  be  conducted  safely  with  countries  that 
have  BSE  present  in  their  cattle  population.  Our  proposed  rule  is  consistent  with 
these guidelines. I want to emphasize again that our risk assessment considered the 
entire  risk  pathway—all  of  the  series  of  risk  mitigations  in  place.  The  proposed  re-
quirement—only  allowing  imports  of  live  bovines  born  on  or  after  March  1,  1999—
is one step in the process that effectively decreases the risk. 
Canadian Feed Ban 

I’d like to say a few more words about the ruminant-to-ruminant feed ban in Can-

ada and our evaluation regarding its effectiveness. 

Similar to the United States, Canada has had feed ban regulations in place since 

August 1997. 

The Canadian Food Inspection Agency (CFIA) has conducted a comprehensive epi-
demiological  investigation  into  each  of  the  BSE  cases  found  in  the  country.  In  each 
instance,  appropriate  measures  have  been  taken  to  identify  and  remove  any  birth 
cohorts  (animals  born  within  a  year  of  the  affected  animal  and  that  could  possibly 
been  exposed  to  the  same  feed  at  the  same  time)  that  were  still  alive.  Each  inves-
tigation  also  included  a  detailed  examination  to  determine  the  possible  feed  expo-
sure source. In those instances where noncompliance events occurred, CFIA has in-
stituted enforcement investigations for regulatory violations. 

Finally,  as  part  of  the  original  minimal-risk  rule,  an  evaluation  was  done  that 
concluded  Canada’s  feed  ban  is  effectively  enforced.  This  conclusion  was  based  on 
consideration of the regulations in place and the statutory authority for those regu-
lations,  adequate  infrastructure  to  implement  the  regulations,  and  evidence  of  im-
plementation  and  monitoring.  In  our  January  9  proposed  rule,  we  gave  additional 
consideration to defining when full implementation and effective enforcement of the 
Canadian  feed  ban  was  achieved.  Full  implementation  occurred  after  completion  of 
an  initial  (or  practical)  implementation  period  and  after  sufficient  time  elapsed  to 
allow most feed products to cycle through the system. For Canada, this practical im-
plementation took approximately 6 months, and then 12 months was considered suf-
ficient time to allow products to cycle through the system, given cattle management 
practices in that country. 

In  following  the  OIE  guidelines  for  trade  in  live  animals,  we  therefore  identified 
March  1,  1999,  as  the  date  when  Canada’s  feed  ban  was  effectively  enforced.  We 
are  not  defining  effectively  enforced  to  mean  100  percent  compliance,  however,  or 
that  there  is  no  possibility  for  isolated  incidents/human  error  throughout  the  proc-
ess.  Nor  does  it  mean  that  no  affected  animals  will  be  born  after  this  date—again, 
despite  feed  bans  in  many  countries,  affected  animals  continue  to  be  found,  but  at 
a declining rate. 
International Trade 

USDA’s  efforts  to  reopen  export  markets  to  U.S.  beef  remain  a  top  priority.  We 
believe  that  the  most  effective  way  of  promoting  harmonized  international  beef 
trade  is  to  base  our  own  policies  in  sound  science,  and  to  encourage  our  trading 
partners  to  also  base  their  import  requirements  on  science.  Our  proposed  changes 
to  the  minimal-risk  region  regulation  are  another  positive  step  forward  in  this  re-
gard. 

In  regard  to  trade,  Secretary  Johanns  has  said  on  numerous  occasions  that  our 
actions must be undertaken with the utmost deliberation, using science as the basis. 
In the absence of that science, sanitary and phytosanitary (SPS) restrictions will be 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  15:54 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 035813 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35813.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

12

used  arbitrarily  by  some  nations,  without  any  basis  of  protecting  human  or  animal 
health. 

I  want  to  be  very  clear  that  while  protecting  human  and  animal  health  must  re-
main our top priority, I know that we can seek to return to normal patterns of inter-
national  commerce  by  continuing  to  use  science  as  the  basis  for  decisionmaking  by 
U.S. regulatory authorities and our trading partners. 
Conclusion 

Senator,  these  proposed  actions  are  an  important  move  in  our  efforts  to  promote 
fair,  science-based  trade  practices.  I  am  confident  in  saying  that  we  can  take  this 
next  step  while  at  the  same  time  protecting  American  agriculture  and  maintaining 
confidence in the U.S. beef supply. 

I am happy to answer any questions you have regarding the issues I’ve raised in 

my testimony. 

Thank you again for the opportunity to be here today.

Senator DORGAN. Dr. DeHaven, thank you very much. Obviously 
you have stimulated my interest to ask a lot of questions, but I will 
defer until all our witnesses have testified. I will now call on North 
Dakota Agricultural Commissioner Roger Johnson. 

STATEMENT OF ROGER JOHNSON, COMMISSIONER, NORTH 

DAKOTA DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE 

Mr. JOHNSON. Thank you very much, Senator Dorgan, for holding 
this hearing. It’s certainly a timely subject, and thank you, also, for 
granting  me  permission  to  be  accompanied  by  our  State  Veteri-
narian, Dr. Keller. 

Whenever  I  make  statements  relative  to  BSE,  I’ve  been  careful 
to consult with her and to use the science that she understands as 
the basis of my statements and of my positions, and so I very much 
appreciate  the  fact  that  you’ve  allowed  her  to  be  with  me.  It  is—
and  I  would  also  anticipate  that  if  there  are  very  technical  ques-
tions,  I  would  hope  that  I  could  defer  to  her  scientific  training  to 
respond to some of those. 

It  has  been  frustrating  for  me  to  witness  USDA’s  continuing  ef-
forts  to  open  the  border  to  Canadian  cattle  and  products  despite 
the  known  risk  and  the  unknown  prevalence  of  BSE  in  the  Cana-
dian cattle herd. 

USDA  acknowledges  that  cattle  over  30  months  of  age  are  at 
even greater risk of having the disease than are the younger cattle 
currently  allowed  in  under  only  stringent  movement  restrictions 
that  require  the  transport  of  animals  in  a  sealed  truck  directly  to 
approved feedlots and/or slaughter. 

Canada has now recorded, as you indicated, ten cases of BSE, six 
since the beginning of last year, and the most recent case just this 
month.  I  think  there  are  a  number  of  issues  that  we  need  to  talk 
about. 

First  of  all,  Canada,  itself,  is  taking  additional  precautions  over 
and  above  what  we  are  doing  internally,  and  so  it  really  begs  the 
question,  if  we  are  allowing  the  Canadian  cattle  to  come  into  our 
herd,  should  we  be  doing  additional  things  to  protect  our  herd  as 
a result of that intermixing that’s likely to be occurring? 

USDA, I think, has unilaterally ignored the fact that other coun-
tries do not approve of USDA’s new BSE minimal-risk status. This 
is something that was created just for Canada. 

Canada  will  implement  more  stringent  restrictions  on  the  use  of 
SRMs,  specified  risk  materials,  in  both  ruminant  and  non-rumi-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  15:54 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 035813 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35813.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

13

nant  feed.  The  success  of  this  prohibition  will  be  inconclusive  for 
several years. During the meantime, we will be importing these ad-
ditional Canadian cattle. 

This  minimal-risk  rule  number  two  acknowledges  the  risk  of 
SRMs  from  older  Canadian  cattle  by  declaring  that  the  distal 
ileums of these older-aged animals cannot enter the U.S. The same 
rule,  however,  allows  older  cattle  to  be  trucked  across  the  border 
with their distal ileums intact. It makes no effort to completely re-
move the distal ileums from all U.S. beef shipped. 

USDA’s  overall  lack  of  responsible  actions  with  respect  to  BSE 
in Canada has already decreased the status of the U.S. cattle herd 
in  the  eyes  of  our  trading  partners.  And  the  information  that  you 
put  up,  Senator  Dorgan,  coming  right  out  of  the  Korean  press  I 
think  absolutely  makes  that  point.  When  we  intermingle  these 
herds, other countries are going to take notice of that. 

The  second  issue  deals  with  feed  cohorts  and  the  types  of  BSE. 
Canada acknowledges that contaminated feed was the likely source 
of the infection up there and that additional feed cohorts are likely 
to  be  infected,  as  well.  Yet  higher  risk,  older  feed  cohorts  will  now 
be allowed to come across the border if this rule is adopted. 

In  addition,  five  Canadian  BSE  cases  reportedly  were  born  after 
the  implementation  of  the  1997  feed  ban,  indicating  that  the  feed 
ban  has  not  been  effective  in  preventing  BSE  or  there  is  an  even 
greater  prevalence  of  BSE  in  their  country  than  what  was  origi-
nally  thought.  Either  scenario  increases  the  probability  that  in-
fected cows will be imported into the USA. 

Canada is clearly admitting that it has a BSE problem. Through 
regulatory  actions  USDA  appears  to  want  to  bring  Canada’s  prob-
lem into the U.S. and make it ours. 

The identification issue. If Canadian cattle over 30 months of age 
are  allowed  to  come  into  the  U.S.,  those  animals  must  be  perma-
nently  identified  with  an  official  tag  and  a  CAN  brand  and  must 
be  strictly  segregated  by  USDA  through  the  entire  slaughtering 
process.  Should  positive  cases  of  BSE  be  found  in  any  Canadian 
animals  that  are  processed  in  the  U.S.,  it  must  not  be  to  the  det-
riment of the U.S. cattle industry or our consumers. 

USDA should not implement this rule until it can assure domes-
tic  and  foreign  markets  of  the  origin  of  our  beef  products.  Finding 
another BSE-infected cow from Canada in the U.S. could be just as 
devastating  to  our  domestic  market  as  it  has  been  to  our  export 
markets. 

As  you  indicated,  I  believe  that  we  must  have  mandatory  coun-
try-of-origin labeling fully implemented before we even consider ad-
ditional imports of Canadian animals. 

The  question  of  age.  Allowing  the  importation  of  Canadian-born 
cattle  after  March  1,  1999,  does  not  make  scientific  sense  in  light 
of  the  BSE  cases  diagnosed  in  Canada  after  USDA  declared  that 
Canada’s  feed  ban  was,  ‘‘effective.’’  It’s  also  unenforceable  since  it 
is  nearly  impossible  to  verify  the  true  age  of  older  cattle.  In  many 
cases veterinarians will have to accept producers’ statements as the 
only source of verification on the age of the cattle. 

BSE minimal-risk status. BSE is not only an animal health con-
cern, it’s also a public safety concern. Congress should demand that 
USDA adhere to the most conservative policies with respect to BSE 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  15:54 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 035813 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35813.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

14

that  the  OIE  guidelines  allow.  USDA  appears  to  be  establishing  a 
much  more  lenient  approach  to  animal  health  standards  for  the 
U.S.  How  can  producers  and  consumers  be  assured  that  USDA’s 
minimal-risk status would not be assigned to other countries subse-
quently  who  may  have  19  or  109  or  229,  or  whatever  number, 
greater number of BSE cases? 

Foreign markets is the last issue I want to address. I believe this 
proposed  rule  will  make  it  more  difficult  for  the  U.S.  to  regain  its 
lost  export  markets.  The  United  States  must  first  restore  and 
maintain  the  confidence  of  our  foreign  trading  partners  before  we 
allow  additional  suspect  animals  into  the  U.S.  marketplace  from  a 
country  that  has  not  met  international  standards  of  minimal-risk. 
Japan  and  Korea  have  reduced  U.S.  beef  imports  and  continue 
to put up additional restrictions and roadblocks. I believe that this 
issue of access to our foreign market needs to be resolved before we 
go down this road. 

In  summary,  I  believe  that  opening  the  border  to  these  older 
than 30 months of age cattle in the manner proposed in this Mini-
mal Risk Rule 2 cannot be justified at this time and will only serve 
to  increase  the  risk  of  BSE  being  introduced  into  the  U.S.  cattle 
herd. 

Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Johnson follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF ROGER JOHNSON, COMMISSIONER, NORTH DAKOTA 

DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE 

Senator  Dorgan  and  Members  of  the  U.S.  Senate  Subcommittee  on  Interstate 
Commerce,  Trade,  and  Tourism,  I  am  North  Dakota  Agriculture  Commissioner 
Roger  Johnson.  I  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  testify  on  behalf  of  North  Dakota 
State  Veterinarian  Dr.  Susan  Keller  and  myself  in  opposition  to  the  United  States 
Department of Agriculture (USDA) proposal allowing importation of Canadian cattle 
over 30 months of age. 

It is frustrating to witness USDA’s continuing efforts to open the border to Cana-
dian  cattle  and  products,  despite  the  known  risks  and  the  unknown  prevalence  of 
bovine spongiform encephalopathy (BSE) in the Canadian cow herd. USDA acknowl-
edges  that  cattle  over  30  months  of  age  are  at  even  greater  risk  of  having  the  dis-
ease  than  are  the  younger  cattle  currently  allowed  in  only  under  stringent  move-
ment restrictions that require transport of animals in a sealed truck directly to ap-
proved  feedlots  and/or  slaughter.  Canada  has  now  recorded  10  cases  of  BSE,  six 
within  the  last  year  and  the  most  recent  case  just  this  month.  Before  we  further 
lift  of  our  import  restrictions  and  requirements  on  Canadian  cattle,  we  must  con-
sider a number of issues. 
Canada Taking Additional Precautions 

While  Canada  is  taking  additional  measures  to  decrease  the  potential  amplifi-
cation and spread of typical BSE, USDA has unilaterally ignored the fact that other 
countries  do  not  approve  of  USDA’s  new  BSE  minimal-risk  status.  This  summer, 
Canada will implement more stringent restrictions on the use of specified risk mate-
rials  (SRMs)  in  both  ruminant  and  non-ruminant  feed.  The  success  of  this  prohibi-
tion  will  be  inconclusive  for  several  years,  because  of  BSE’s  long  incubation  period. 
Further, the United States does not have these measures in place, nor are they even 
being initiated. 

Minimal  Risk  Rule  2  (MRR2)—the  proposed  rule  allowing  Canadian  cattle  over 
thirty  months  of  age  into  the  U.S.—acknowledges  the  risk  of  the  SRMs  from  older 
Canadian  cattle  by  declaring  that  the  distal  ileums  of  these  older  age  animals  can-
not  enter  the  U.S.  The  same  rule,  however,  allows  older  cattle  to  be  trucked  across 
the border with their distal ileums intact and makes no effort to completely remove 
the distal ileums from all U.S. feed supplements, including those to non-ruminants, 
as is the case now in Canada. How can this be explained logically to producers and 
consumers, both here and abroad? 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  15:54 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 035813 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35813.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

15

While  USDA  buries  its  head  in  the  sand,  Canada  is  taking  at  least  some  addi-
tional  actions  to  improve  their  ability  to  export  and  decrease  the  incidence  of  BSE 
in their national herd over time. USDA’s overall lack of responsible actions with re-
spect  to  BSE  in  Canada  has  already  decreased  the  status  of  the  U.S.  cattle  herd 
in the eyes of our trading partners. 
Feed Cohorts and Types of BSE 

Canada  acknowledges  that  contaminated  feed  was  the  likely  source  of  the  infec-
tion  and  that  additional  feed  cohorts  are  likely  to  be  infected  as  well.  Yet  higher 
risk,  older  feed  cohorts,  will  be  allowed  to  come  across  the  border,  if  this  rule  is 
adopted. In addition, five Canadian BSE cases reportedly were born after the imple-
mentation of its 1997 feed ban, indicating that either the ban has not been effective 
in  preventing  BSE  or  there  is  a  greater  prevalence  of  BSE  in  their  country  than 
originally  thought.  Either  scenario  increases  the  probability  that  infected  cows  will 
be imported into the U.S. 

Canada  is  clearly  admitting  it  has  a  BSE  problem.  Through  regulatory  actions, 
USDA  appears  to  want  to  bring  Canada’s  problem  into  the  U.S.  and  make  it  ours. 
We  must  remember  that  Canada’s  BSE  cases  have  all  been  identified  as  ‘‘typical’’ 
BSE  and  the  U.S.  cases  have  all  been  identified  as  an  ‘‘atypical’’  form  of  BSE.  The 
pathogenic differences between those two prion forms are still unknown. 
Identification 

I  believe  that  if  Canadian  cattle  over  thirty  months  of  age  (OTM)  are  allowed  to 
come  into  the  U.S.,  those  animals  must  be  permanently  identified  with  an  official 
tag and a CAN brand and must be strictly segregated by USDA through the entire 
slaughtering  process.  Should  positive  cases  of  BSE  be  found  in  any  Canadian  ani-
mals that are processed in the U.S., it must not be to the detriment of the U.S. cat-
tle industry or our consumers. 

The recent investigation of seven head of Canadian animals slaughtered in a Ne-
braska  plant  dramatically  points  out  the  critical  need  to  improve  animal  identifica-
tion  and  tracking  capabilities  in  the  U.S.,  starting  first  at  our  ports  and  borders. 
USDA  needs  to  start  leading  by  example  in  all  matters  associated  with  animal 
health. Its primary concern should be its own current inability to quickly and accu-
rately trace all animals that enter the U.S. and ultimately our food supply. 

USDA  should  not  implement  this  rule  until  it  can  assure  domestic  and  foreign 
markets  of  the  origin  of  our  beef  products.  Finding  another  BSE-infected  cow  from 
Canada  in  the  U.S.  could  be  just  as  devastating  to  our  domestic  market  as  it  has 
been  to  our  export  markets.  We  must  have  mandatory,  country-of-origin  labeling 
fully  implemented  before  USDA  further  weakens  our  standards  on  Canadian  beef 
imports. 
Age 

Allowing importation of Canadian cattle born after March 1, 1999 does not make 
scientific sense in light of the BSE cases diagnosed in Canada after USDA declared 
that  Canada’s  feed  ban  was  ‘‘effective.’’  It  is  also  unenforceable,  since  it  is  nearly 
impossible  to  verify  the  true  age  of  older  (Canadian)  cattle.  In  many  cases,  veteri-
narians  will  have  to  accept  producers’  statements  as  the  only  source  of  verification 
on the age of their cattle. When dealing with a disease such as BSE, with its serious 
health  and  economic  implications,  this  is  not  an  effective  import  requirement.  Ani-
mals born prior to March 1, 1999, will unknowingly (even to the veterinarians sign-
ing  certificates  of  veterinary  inspection)  be  able  to  move  into  the  U.S.  under  this 
proposed rule. 
BSE Minimal Risk Status 

BSE  is  not  only  an  animal  health  concern,  but  it  is  also  a  public  safety  concern. 
Congress  should  demand  that  USDA  adhere  to  the  most  conservative  policies  with 
respect  to  BSE  that  the  OIE  guidelines  allow.  USDA  appears  to  be  establishing  a 
much  more  lenient  approach  to  animal  health  standards  for  the  U.S.  How  can  pro-
ducers  and  consumers  be  assured  that  USDA’s  ‘‘Minimal  Risk  Status’’  will  not  be 
assigned  to  other  countries  that  have  19,  109  or  even  a  greater  number  of  BSE 
cases? 
Foreign Markets 

I  believe  this  proposed  rule  will  make  it  more  difficult  for  the  U.S.  to  regain  its 
lost  export  markets.  The  United  States  must  first  restore  and  maintain  the  con-
fidence  of  our  foreign  trading  partners  before  we  allow  any  additional  suspect  ani-
mals into the U.S. marketplace from a country that has not met international stand-
ards of minimal-risk. Japan and Korea have reduced U.S. beef imports and continue 
to  put  up  additional  restrictions  and  roadblocks.  I  believe  this  rule  would  make  it 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  15:54 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 035813 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35813.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

16

even  harder  to  regain  their  confidence  and  may  result  in  the  permanent  loss  of 
these  markets.  USDA’s  inability  to  fully  regain  these  lost  exports  makes  the  case 
that more stringent standards are needed rather than proposing to allow additional 
risks  for  our  domestic  and  foreign  markets.  If  we  are  to  maintain  current  export 
markets and regain lost export markets, USDA should make its existing and future 
BSE import policies compliant with OIE international standards. 
Summary 

The science of prion diseases (especially BSE) is still unfolding, and the sensitivity 
of  tests  and  detection  limits  are  continually  improving.  There  must  be  more  cer-
tainty and fewer assumptions before rules are promulgated to allow more high risk 
cattle  from  Canada  to  enter  the  U.S.,  or  the  results  could  be  devastating.  Opening 
the border to OTM age cattle in the manner proposed in the MRR2 cannot be justi-
fied  at  this  time  and  will  only  serve  to  increase  the  risk  of  BSE  being  introduced 
into the U.S. cattle herd. 

Senator Dorgan and Committee Members, thank you for the opportunity to testify 

on this important issue. I would be happy to answer any questions.

Senator  DORGAN.  Mr.  Johnson,  thank  you  very  much.  Next,  we 
will hear from Mark Huseth, who is the President of the North Da-
kota Stockmen’s Association. Mr. Huseth, thank you for being here. 
STATEMENT OF MARK HUSETH, PRESIDENT, NORTH DAKOTA 

STOCKMEN’S ASSOCIATION 

Mr.  HUSETH.  Thank  you,  Senator.  Good  morning.  My  name  is 
Mark Huseth. My wife and I, Eileen, ranch in partnership with our 
adult  sons  on  our  third-generation  family  operation  near  McLeod, 
North Dakota, in the Sheyenne River Valley. 

I  have  the  privilege  of  representing  cattlemen  like  myself  from 
across  this  great  state  this  year  as  President  of  the  North  Dakota 
Stockmen’s  Association.  It  is  on  their  behalf  that  I  appear  before 
you today. 

Our  forward-thinking  cattlemen  and  cattlewomen  formulated  a 
policy  back  at  our  2005  annual  convention  in  anticipation  of  this 
very  proposed  rule  which  would  expand  allowable  Canadian  im-
ports to include live animals 30 months and older. The Stockmen’s 
Association  member  resolution  opposes  any  further  expansion  of 
Canadian  beef  trade  until  the  United  States  receives  assurances 
from  Canada  and  its  other  trading  partners  that  if  trade  is  ex-
panded and a problem is detected in a foreign-born import, that the 
animal’s country-of-origin, not the U.S., will suffer from any result-
ing trade sanctions. 

The resolution also calls for an orderly market transition plan to 
be put in place before the border is opened further so a sudden sup-
ply shock does not cripple the domestic market. 

Nearly  2  years  later  these  stipulations  have  not  been  satisfied, 

and so our opposition to the proposed rule holds true today. 

Before I go any further, I want to emphasize that we are not op-
posed  to  the  U.S.  Department  of  Agriculture’s  proposed  rule  be-
cause of food safety concerns. That’s because BSE, as you know, is 
not  a  contagious  disease  and  the  mode  of  infection  is  through  the 
consumption of feed contaminated with abnormal prion protein. 

The  United  States  ruminant  feed  ban  and  other  harvest  meas-
ures,  like  the  removal  of  all  specified  risk  materials,  have  proven 
effective  in  identifying  sick  animals  and  keeping  them  out  of  the 
food  supply.  We’re  confident  in  this  industry  and  the  government-
implemented firewalls to maintain the level of food safety and con-
sumer  confidence  that  we  worked  so  hard  for  and  are  so  proud  of. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  15:54 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 035813 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35813.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

17

At  the  same  time,  the  North  Dakota  Stockmen’s  Association 
views  the  realization  of  Canadian  trade  as  premature.  That’s  be-
cause  we’re  still  suffering  from  the  consequences  of  the  Canadian-
born cow diagnosed with BSE in our country in December of 2003. 
The  lone  animal,  commonly  referred  to  as  the  ‘‘cow  that  stole 
Christmas,’’  changed  the  U.S.  beef  industry.  More  than  3  years 
later we are still working to recover import global beef markets and 
the  consumer  confidence  that  were  snatched  away  that  December 
23rd. 

Before  we  open  the  border  wider  and  possibly  exaggerate  the 
problems  we  already  have,  we  have  to  make  sure  that  we  protect 
our domestic cattle producers from unintended harm to ensure that 
they  have  the  opportunity  to  make  an  honest  living  without  the 
threat of another country’s cattle collapsing their market and driv-
ing them out of business. 

Our  members  ask  that  USDA’s  proposed  rule  not  be  adopted 
until  the  following  conditions  have  been  met.  Number  one,  the 
United  States  receives  in  writing  guarantees  from  Canada  and  all 
of  its  other  beef-trading  partners  that  any  disease  problem  identi-
fied in a foreign-born imported animal in the United States be con-
sidered the problem of its country-of-origin. 

In  addition,  any  trade  sanctions  those  countries  impose  because 
of  the  disease  situation  be  on  that  country-of-origin.  The  United 
States, on the other hand, would not suffer the kind of trade back-
lash  it  still  is  recovering  from  since  the  first  case  of  BSE  in  2003. 
Likewise,  the  World  Organization  for  Animal  Health,  or  OIE,  rec-
ognizes  the  United  States  with  the  same  low-risk  health  status  if 
the disease occurs in an imported animal. 

Number two, USDA develops and implements an orderly market 
transition  plan  before  expanding  the  scope  of  cattle  and  beef  im-
ports from Canada. This would involve gradually accepting in such 
imports so as not to overload our country’s supply and crash those 
markets.  We  think  this  is  especially  critical  to  preserve  our  al-
ready-overloaded  slaughter  cow  and  slaughter  bull  processing  fa-
cilities, particularly in the northern tier where many Canadian cat-
tle would likely be sent. 

You can imagine the impact when you add the estimated 545,000 
cows and 66,000 cull bulls and stags that would enter this country 
each year over a 5-year period if the proposed rule is adopted. That 
would  lead  to  an  annual  decrease  in  beef  prices  of  approximately 
$4  per  hundredweight  or  $50  for  a  1,250-pound  cow.  Multiply  that 
by an average of 140,000 cull cows sold by North Dakota producers 
each year, and you arrive at approximately a $7 million impact per 
year to cattlemen and women from our state alone. We can’t afford 
to do that. 

Number  three,  before  entering  the  United  States  all  Canadian 
cattle  are  permanently  identified  with  a  universal  hot-iron  brand 
that  designates  them  as  Canadian  cattle.  The  brand  would  pre-
serve  the  cattle’s  identity  through  slaughter  and  make  it  crystal 
clear  where  they  originated.  Tattoos,  on  the  other  hand,  cannot  be 
read  at  a  glance  and  can  fade  over  time.  Consequently,  we  do  not 
support tattoos as identification means for these imported animals. 
Number  four,  a  further  evaluation  of  the  Canadian  feed  ban  be 
conducted  in  light  of  the  most  recent  BSE  cases  detected  there. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  15:54 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 035813 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35813.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

18

While  USDA  has  determined  that  Canada  has  a  robust  inspection 
program,  that  overall  compliance  with  the  feed  ban  is  good  and 
that  the  feed  ban  is  reducing  the  risk  of  transmission  of  BSE  in 
the Canadian cattle population, they did identify a possible exemp-
tion  in  the  ban  with  mineral  mixes  produced  with  ruminal  meat 
and bone meal before the feed ban took effect. Maybe a mandatory 
recall  of  such  mixes  would  help  curtail  the  number  of  cases  there. 
We  empathize  with  our  Canadian  neighbors  and  the  situation 
they  are  in.  The  North  Dakota  Stockmen’s  Association  has  always 
supported  fair  trade  and  maintained  that  our  producers  can  com-
pete  and  win  in  the  global  market  of  beef  because  of  the  superior 
cattle and beef we raise in this country. 

We  look  forward  to  expanding  our  trade  with  Canada  in  the  fu-
ture.  However,  now  is  not  yet  the  time,  and  in  order  for  our  beef 
trade  with  Canada  to  be  fair,  the  steps  we  outline  today  must  be 
taken before the USDA’s rule is implemented. 

We  appreciate  the  chance  to  share  our  perspective  with  you 
today and the fact that you have recognized this issue as an impor-
tant  one  to  us.  I  thank  you  very  much,  and  I  will  also  address 
questions  later,  and  if  there  are  any  technical  ones,  I  would  also 
defer to Dr. Keller. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Huseth follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF MARK HUSETH, PRESIDENT, NORTH DAKOTA STOCKMEN’S 

ASSOCIATION 

Good  morning,  Senator  Byron  Dorgan,  and  Members  of  the  Senate  Interstate 

Commerce, Trade, and Tourism Subcommittee. 

My  name  is  Mark  Huseth.  My  wife,  Eileen,  and  I  ranch  in  partnership  with  our 
adult  sons  on  our  third-generation  family  operation  near  McLeod,  N.D.,  in  the 
Sheyenne River Valley. I have the privilege of representing cattle producers like my-
self  from  across  this  great  state  this  year  as  the  President  of  the  North  Dakota 
Stockmen’s Association. It is on their behalf that I appear before you today. 

Those forward-thinking cattlemen and cattlewomen formulated policy back at our 
2005 Annual Convention in anticipation of this very proposed rule, which would ex-
pand allowable Canadian imports to include live animals 30 months and older. The 
Stockmen’s Association’s member resolution opposes any further expansion of Cana-
dian  beef  trade  until  the  United  States  receives  assurances  from  Canada  and  its 
other trading partners that, if trade is expanded and a problem is detected in a for-
eign-born  import,  that  the  animal’s  country-of-origin,  not  the  U.S.,  will  suffer  any 
resulting trade sanctions. 

The  resolution  also  calls  for  an  orderly  market  transition  plan  to  be  put  in  place 
before  the  border  is  opened  further,  so  a  sudden  supply  shock  doesn’t  cripple  the 
domestic market. 

Nearly 2 years later, those stipulations have not been satisfied, and so our opposi-

tion to the proposed rule still holds true today. 

Before I go further, I want to emphasize that we are not opposed to the U.S. De-
partment  of  Agriculture’s  (USDA)  proposed  rule  because  of  food  safety  concerns. 
That’s because bovine spongiform encephalopathy, as you know, is not a contagious 
disease, and the mode of infection is through the consumption of feed contaminated 
with  abnormal  prion  protein.  The  United  States’  ruminant  feed  ban  and  other  har-
vest measures, like the removal of all specified risk materials (the only things capa-
ble  of  carrying  the  disease),  have  proven  effective  in  identifying  sick  animals  and 
keeping them out of the food supply. We’re confident in these industry- and govern-
ment-implemented  firewalls  to  maintain  the  level  of  food  safety  and  consumer  con-
fidence that we work so hard for and are so proud of. 

At  the  same  time,  the  North  Dakota  Stockmen’s  Association  views  the  liberaliza-
tion  of  Canadian  trade  as  premature.  That’s  because  we  are  still  suffering  the  con-
sequences  of  the  Canadian-born  cow  diagnosed  with  BSE  in  our  country  in  Decem-
ber 2003. That lone animal, commonly referred to as ‘‘the cow that stole Christmas,’’ 
changed the U.S. beef industry. More than 3 years later, we are still working to re-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  15:54 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 035813 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35813.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

19

cover  important  global  beef  markets  and  customer  confidence  that  were  snatched 
away that December 23. 

Before we open the border wider and possibly exaggerate the problems we already 
have, we have to make sure that we protect our domestic cattle producers from un-
intended harm—to ensure that they have the opportunity to make an honest living 
without  the  threat  of  another  country’s  cattle  collapsing  their  market  and  driving 
them out of business. 

Our  members  ask  that  USDA’s  proposed  rule  not  be  adopted  until  the  following 

conditions have been met:

1.  The  United  States  receives,  in  writing,  guarantees  from  Canada  and  all  its 
other  beef  trading  partners  that  any  disease  problem  identified  in  a  foreign-
born,  imported  animal  in  the  United  States  be  considered  the  problem  of  its 
country-of-origin.  In  addition,  any  trade  sanctions  those  countries  impose  be-
cause  of  the  disease  situation  be  on  that  country-of-origin.  The  United  States, 
on  the  other  hand,  would  not  suffer  the  kind  of  trade  backlash  it  still  is  recov-
ering from since the first case of BSE in 2003. Likewise, the World Organization 
for Animal Health, or OIE, recognizes the United States with its same low-risk 
health status if the disease occurs in an imported animal.
2. USDA develops and implements an orderly market transition plan before ex-
panding  the  scope  of  cattle  and  beef  imports  from  Canada.  This  would  involve 
gradually  accepting  in  such  imports  so  as  not  to  overload  our  country’s  supply 
and crash those markets. We think this is especially critical to preserve our al-
ready-overloaded slaughter cow and slaughter bull processing facilities, particu-
larly  in  the  northern  tier,  where  many  Canadian  cattle  would  likely  be  sent. 
You can imagine the impact when you add the estimated 545,000 cull cows and 
66,000 cull bulls and stags that would enter this country each year over a five-
year  period  if  the  proposed  rule  is  adopted.  That  would  lead  to  an  annual  de-
crease in beef prices of $4 per hundredweight, or $50 per 1,250-pound cow. Mul-
tiply  that  by  an  average  of  140,000  cull  cows  sold  by  North  Dakota  producers 
each  year  and  you  arrive  at  a  $7  million  impact  per  year  to  cattlemen  and 
women from our state alone. We can’t afford to do that.
3. Before entering the United States, all Canadian cattle are permanently iden-
tified with a universal hot-iron brand that designates them as Canadian cattle. 
The  brand  would  preserve  the  cattle’s  identify  through  slaughter  and  make  it 
crystal  clear  where  they  originated.  Tattoos,  on  the  other  hand,  cannot  be  read 
at a glance and can fade over time. Consequently, we do not support tattoos as 
an identification means for these imported animals.
4.  A  further  evaluation  of  the  Canadian  feed  ban  be  conducted  in  light  of  the 
most  recent  BSE  cases  detected  there.  While  USDA  has  determined  that  Can-
ada has a robust inspection program, that overall compliance with the feed ban 
is  good  and  that  the  feed  ban  is  reducing  the  risk  of  transmission  of  BSE  in 
the  Canadian  cattle  population,  they  did  identify  a  ‘‘possible  exception’’  in  the 
ban with mineral mixes produced with ruminal meat and bone meal before the 
feed ban took effect. Maybe a mandatory recall of such mixes could help curtail 
the number of cases there.

We  empathize  with  our  Canadian  neighbors  and  the  situation  they  are  in.  We 
know  what  they  are  going  through,  because  we’re  in  a  similar  situation  ourselves. 
The  North  Dakota  Stockmen’s  Association  has  always  supported  fair  trade  and 
maintained  that  our  producers  can  compete  and  win  in  the  global  beef  market,  be-
cause  of  the  superior  cattle  and  beef  we  raise  in  this  country.  We  look  forward  to 
expanding  our  trade  with  Canada  in  the  future.  However,  now  is  not  yet  the  time, 
and, in order for our beef trade with Canada to be fair, the steps we outlined today 
must be taken before USDA’s rule is implemented. 

We  appreciate  the  chance  to  share  our  perspective  with  you  today  and  the  fact 

that you have recognized this issue as the important one it is. Thank you. 

I would be happy to address any questions that you may have.

Senator  DORGAN.  Mr.  Huseth,  thank  you  very  much.  Next,  we 
will  hear  from  Mr.  Leo  McDonnell,  on  behalf  of  R–CALF  USA.  I 
understand  you’re  from  Columbus,  Montana  and  ranch  in  Rhame, 
North Dakota; is that correct? 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  15:54 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 035813 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35813.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

20

STATEMENT  OF  LEO  R.  MCDONNELL,  JR.,  FORMER
PRESIDENT/CO-FOUNDER,  RANCHERS–CATTLEMEN  ACTION 
LEGAL  FUND,  UNITED  STOCKGROWERS  OF  AMERICA
(R–CALF USA) 
Mr.  MCDONNELL.  Yes,  sir.  Thank  you,  Chairman  Dorgan,  for 
holding  this  hearing.  It’s  very  important  to  U.S.  cattle  producers. 
Today  USDA  is  considering  allowing  in  over-30-month  beef  and 
cattle  from  Canada,  a  product  that  is  banned  for  health  concerns 
from  nearly  every  international  market,  products  that  the  United 
States cannot even export to our primary market. That is, USDA’s 
actions will make the United States a dumping ground for beef and 
cattle  banned  from  major  international  markets,  and  at  the  same 
time  U.S.  producers  are  being  lobbied  against  by  major  importers 
here  in  the  United  States  from  being  able  to  differentiate  their 
product with country-of-origin labeling. Makes no sense. I think we 
have  to  ask  ourselves  who  benefits  from  these  actions?  Not  U.S. 
producers, not U.S. consumers. 

It’s been said that this is a North American problem. This is not 
a  North  American  problem.  Canada  has  tested  around  140,000 
head since 2004 and has found eight cases with typical prions. The 
United States has tested 800,000 head and found only two cases in 
our  native  herd  with  atypical  prions.  Completely  different  prions. 
The Canadian and the European prions with BSE are very aggres-
sive, and really there’s very little known about the atypical prions. 
Make  no  doubt  if  USDA  is  allowed  to  proceed  in  allowing  over-
30-month  beef  and  cattle,  then  the  full  weight  of  the  Canadian 
problem  is  going  to  be  put  squarely  on  U.S.  ranchers’  shoulders, 
and  Canada  would  be  relieved  of  those  problems,  the  economic 
problems. 

You  don’t  manage  risk  by  increasing  exposure.  Sound  science 
tells  you  you  do  not  eradicate  a  disease  by  increasing  exposure. 
United  States  should  be  pursuing  sound  science  that  is  practiced 
by major importing countries, and we should strive to upward har-
monize  those  import  practices  surrounding  health  and  safety 
issues, not pursuing some of the lowest standards in the world. 

U.S. beef exports remain at less than half of the 2003 levels, and 
yet  we’ve  had  no  assurances  from  USDA  if  they  find  additional 
cases  in  Canada  or  even  the  United  States  that  we’re  going  to  be 
able  to  maintain  what  new  export  markets  we’ve  opened.  I  believe 
you pointed that out. 

Last  year  we  opened  up  to  under-30-month  cattle,  and  in  6 
months our losses on cattle went from $49 to $150 per head as re-
ported  by  USDA.  The  OTM  rule  on  the  relaxation  of  the  delayed 
rule on beef will worsen its present situation. 

Just last October three major packing plants said that they were 
going  to  cut  their  kill  because  of  weakening  demand  and  over-
supplies  of  cattle.  Why  are  we  letting  more  in?  And  by  the  way, 
over  three-quarters  of  the  increase  in  the  supply  of  those  cattle 
were coming from Canada in the under-30-months. 

The proposed OTM rule did not require Canada to implement the 
applied practices of other BSE-infected countries that have success-
fully reduced the incidence of BSE. Canada has a weaker feed ban. 
It only bans ruminant feed to ruminant animals, not ruminant feed 
to all animals. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  15:54 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 035813 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35813.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

21

Canada has an inferior BSE testing program. It does not test all 
high-risk  cattle  like  other  countries  in  the  European  Union  and 
Japan  does.  Canada  practices  the  least  restrictive  SRM  removal 
policy.  Other  countries  remove  the  vertebrae  and  all  other  high-
risk  tissues  in  much  younger  cattle.  Given  if  the  U.S.  commingles 
Canadian  cattle  and  beef  with  U.S.  cattle  and  beef,  it’s  not  logical 
to  expect  that  Canada’s  weaker  feed  ban,  inferior  testing  program, 
and  least  restrictive  SRM  policies  would  help  the  U.S.  to  restore 
lost beef markets and gain new ones. You don’t gain consumer con-
fidence by lowering your standards. 

The  proposed  OTM  rule,  like  the  existing  BSE  import  policy, 
does not comply with international scientific standards. And I won’t 
go through that. Roger Johnson went through it very well. I believe 
Dr. Keller will. 

But I do want to point out that the OIE recommends that cattle 
not be exported from a BSE-affected country unless the cattle were 
born 2 years after the feed ban was effectively enforced, and that’s 
the  key  word,  ‘‘effectively.’’  We’ve  seen  an  increase  in  young  cattle 
in  Canada  born  after  the  feed  ban  and  a  decrease  in  the  number 
of  cattle  that  were  born  prior  to  the  feed  ban.  That  tells  you  they 
have not had an effective feed ban. 

The  OTM  rule  is  inconsistent  with  OIE  testing  requirements,  I 
believe.  Based  on  OIE  testing  recommendations,  Canada  needs  to 
test 187,000 consecutively targeted cattle with a BSE risk equal to 
that  in  the  casualty  slaughter  age  between  four  and  seven  years. 
They haven’t done that. 

As reflected by the OTM rule, the U.S. does not have a coherent 
comprehensive strategy for resuming beef exports, building new ex-
port  markets,  fully  protecting  animal  health,  and  supporting  con-
sumer confidence in the safety of U.S. beef. 

I think some of the things we need to look at before we even con-
sider  allowing  in  over-30-month  beef  or  cattle  is  the  U.S.  should 
not  give  additional  access  to  the  U.S.  market  until  the  U.S.  fully 
regains  the  share  of  the  global  market  that  we  lost  since  2003. 
Don’t  make  a  dumping  ground  out  of  the  U.S.  market  for  product 
other countries don’t want. 

The  U.S.  should  not  further  relax  its  already  lenient  import 
standards  until  it  can  be  scientifically  documented  that  BSE  is  no 
longer in Canadian feed. I don’t know if you all know this, but this 
summer  Canada  already  has  plans  to  tighten  their  feed  ban.  They 
recognize they’re having problems, so they’re going to make it more 
stringent.  So  why  are  we  letting  these  cattle  in  here?  We  need  to 
wait a while and let their feed ban work. 

The  U.S.  should  not  allow  the  importation  of  over-30-month  cat-
tle  or  beef,  which  are  known  to  be  of  higher  risk  for  transmitting 
BSE,  particularly  now  that  the  disease  is  known  to  have  been  cir-
culating in animals born years after the Canadian feed ban. 

The U.S. should not allow over-30-month cattle or beef from Can-
ada  in  until  both  the  U.S.  and  Canada  has  significantly  strength-
ened their respective feed bans. The U.S. should not allow over-30-
month Canadian cattle or beef into the United States until it addi-
tionally obtains firm assurances from all our U.S. beef export part-
ners that if Canada or the U.S. has another case, they’re not going 
to shut us down. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  15:54 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 035813 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35813.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

22

I  believe  I’ve  probably  gone  over  my  time  so  I’ll  stop  there,  and 

thank you for holding this hearing. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. McDonnell follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF LEO R.  MCDONNELL,  JR.,  FORMER PRESIDENT/CO-FOUND-
ER,  RANCHERS-CATTLEMEN ACTION LEGAL FUND,  UNITED STOCKGROWERS OF 
AMERICA (R–CALF USA) 
Chairman  Inouye,  Vice  Chairman  Stevens,  Members  of  the  Committee,  I  am  Leo 
McDonnell.  My  wife  and  I  own  and  operate  Midland  Bull  Test,  which  is  a  bull  ge-
netic  evaluation  center  in  Columbus,  Montana,  and  we  ranch  in  both  Montana  and 
North  Dakota.  Bulls  from  our  test  center  have  been  sold  in  both  the  domestic  and 
international market and we are cow/calf producers as well as seed stock producers. 
I  am  also  proud  to  be  a  member  of  the  Ranchers-Cattlemen  Action  Legal  Fund—
United  Stockgrowers  of  America  (R–CALF  USA),  an  organization  that  I  co-founded 
in the late 1990s. Our organization has worked tirelessly on behalf of the American 
cattle  producer.  Our  focus  has  been  on  protecting  and  promoting  the  interests  of 
independent  cattle  producers,  and  it  is  from  that  perspective  that  I  speak  to  you 
today.  I  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  provide  comments  on  this  issue  as  it  is  very 
important  to  the  cow/calf  operators,  backgrounders,  stockers  and  feeders  that  con-
stitute the heart of this country’s cattle and beef industry. 
Background 

After  the  December  2003  detection  in  Washington  State  of  a  Canadian-born  cow 
infected  with  bovine  spongiform  encephalopathy  (BSE),  over  50  export  markets 
closed  their  borders  to  U.S.  beef  and  in  2004,  U.S.  beef  exports  fell  to  a  19-year 
low. 1 While  the  U.S.  has  since  struggled  to  negotiate  even  limited  access  for  U.S. 
cattle  and  beef  exports  to  foreign  markets,  the  domestic  market  has  been  thrown 
open to a much broader range of imports from abroad, including imports from Can-
ada  where  10  native  cases  of  BSE  have  so  far  been  detected.  As  a  result,  the  U.S. 
cattle  industry  experienced  its  third  consecutive  year  of  substantially  reduced  ex-
ports  in  2006,  with  the  U.S.  running  a  significant  trade  deficit  in  cattle  and  beef 
estimated  at  $2.7  billion.  At  the  conclusion  of  2006,  U.S.  beef  exports  remained  at 
less than half their 2003 volume. 2

Since late 2003, the U.S. border was closed to all but boneless Canadian beef de-
rived from cattle less than 30 months of age—a product the World Organization for 
Animal  Health  (OIE)  considers  suitable  for  trade  regardless  of  a  country’s  disease 
status. 3 However,  in  mid-2005,  the  USDA  further  opened  the  Canadian  border  to 
both imports of live cattle less than 30 months of age and an expanded scope of beef 
products from cattle less than 30 months of age. 4

Within 6 months of the border’s reopening to live cattle, domestic live cattle prices 
began to plummet. Fed cattle prices in the U.S. fell from $96.50 per cwt. in Decem-
ber  2005  to  $79.10  per  cwt.  in  May  2006,  a  decline  of  $17.40  per  cwt. 5 Cattle  pro-
ducers who sold their fed cattle during this period suffered losses conservatively es-
timated  by  USDA  within  the  range  from  $4.08  per  cwt.  to  $12.93  per  cwt.,  or  $49 
to $155 per head. 6

R–CALF USA believes that USDA’s existing BSE policies are contributing greatly 
to  the  ongoing  losses  experienced  by  U.S.  cattle  producers,  and  we  seek  the  assist-
ance  of  Congress  to  correct  these  existing  policies.  Notwithstanding  the  dire  need 
to  reverse  existing  BSE  policies,  the  USDA’s  recently  proposed  OTM  rule  assures 
that  current  problems  will  be  made  far  worse  for  U.S.  cattle  producers. 7 The  OTM 
rule  would  allow  the  importation  of  live  Canadian  cattle  born  after  March  1,  1999, 
certain  Canadian  beef  products  immediately,  and  the  full  scope  of  Canadian  beef 
products from cattle over 30 months of age at some point thereafter. 

USDA’s  inability  to  fully  restore  lost  export  markets  during  the  past  3  years, 
which  has  caused  substantial  harm  to  the  U.S.  cattle  industry,  is  directly  attrib-
utable to inappropriate BSE policies now in effect, and the proposed OTM Rule will 
only worsen the current situation for the following reasons: 
A.  The  Proposed  OTM  Rule  Does  Not  Require  Canada  To  Implement  the 
Practices That Other BSE-Affected Countries Are Using to Successfully 
Reduce the Incidence of BSE and Protect Consumers 

Canada Has a Weaker Feed Ban 

Canada  has  a  weaker  feed  ban  than  other  BSE-affected  countries,  and,  because 
the U.S. imports Canadian beef and cattle nonetheless, the United States continues 
to experience difficulty in both restoring lost markets and gaining new ones. Under 
current  U.S.  policies,  Canada  is  required  to  maintain  only  the  most  basic  of  feed 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  15:54 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 035813 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35813.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

23

bans—a  feed  ban  determined  by  other  BSE-affected  countries  to  be  insufficient  to 
control the disease. The feed bans of the European Union (EU) and Japan, for exam-
ple,  are  much  more  restrictive  as  they  ban  all  ruminant  material,  including  blood, 
from  all  animal  feed.  Canada  bans  only  ruminant  material,  with  the  exception  of 
blood,  from  only  ruminant  animal  feed.  While  Canada  has  announced  intentions  to 
begin  strengthening  its  feed  ban  in  July  2007,  the  long  incubation  period  of  BSE 
(approximately  5  years) 8 necessitates  a  lengthy  period  of  disease  surveillance  fol-
lowing implementation just to determine if the improvement is successful. 
Canada Has an Inferior BSE Testing Program 

In addition, Canada has an inferior BSE surveillance program when compared to 
other BSE-affected countries, and, because the U.S. imports Canadian beef and cat-
tle  nonetheless,  the  United  States  continues  to  experience  difficulty  in  both  restor-
ing lost markets and gaining new ones. Under current USDA policies, Canada is not 
required to test all high-risk cattle for purposes of determining the prevalence of the 
disease and to ensure that all symptomatic cattle are removed from both the human 
food  chain  and  animal  feed  chain.  In  contrast,  Japan  tests  all  high-risk  cattle  and 
all  cattle  entering  the  human  food  chain.  The  EU  tests  all  high-risk  cattle  over  24 
months of age and all OTM cattle entering the human food chain. 9

Canada, however, has only a voluntary BSE testing program and is testing fewer 
cattle  than  many  BSE-affected  countries  with  much  smaller  herd  sizes. 10 Despite 
Canada’s detection of BSE in younger cattle, including a 50-month old cow, Canada 
does  not  recognize  the  value  of  testing  healthy  cattle  at  slaughter.  This  stands  in 
sharp  contrast  to  the  EU’s  experience,  which  caused  the  EU  to  begin  testing  all 
healthy  slaughtered  OTM  cattle  since  2001. 11 The  EU  detected  113  positive  BSE 
cases in healthy slaughtered cattle in 2005. 12
Canada Practices the Least Restrictive SRM Removal Policies 

Canada  practices  the  least  restrictive  specified  risk  material  (SRM)  removal  poli-
cies  when  compared  to  other  BSE-affected  countries,  and,  because  the  U.S.  imports 
Canadian cattle and beef nonetheless, the U.S. is experiencing difficulty in both re-
storing  lost  markets  and  gaining  new  ones.  The  proposed  OTM  Rule  would  subject 
Canadian  cattle  less  than  8  years  of  age  (cattle  born  after  March  1,  1999)  only  to 
the  same  SRM  removal  policies  adopted  in  the  United  States—a  country  unlike 
Canada  that  has  detected  only  two  atypical  cases  of  BSE  in  cattle  over  10  years  of 
age.  Thus,  Canadian  cattle  less  than  30  months  of  age  will  have  only  their  tonsils 
and distal ileum removed, while only OTM cattle will be subject to the broader SRM 
removal requirements. However, the EU removes the broader list of SRMs from all 
cattle over 12 months of age and Japan removes the broader list of SRMs from cat-
tle of all ages. 

It is counterintuitive to expect that Canada’s weaker feed ban, its inferior testing 
regime, and its less restrictive SRM removal policy are helping to restore consumer 
confidence  in  Canadian  beef  sold  directly  from  Canada  or  Canadian  beef  sold  from 
the United States. Current trade challenges clearly demonstrate this concern: South 
Korea,  for  example,  which  was  the  third  largest  U.S.  beef  importer  in  2003, 13 con-
tinues  to  demand  that  U.S.  slaughter  plants  segregate  U.S.  cattle  from  Canadian 
cattle in their production lines to ensure that no Canadian beef is included in their 
U.S. beef imports; 14 and, recent headlines from the ChinaDaily/Xinhua News Serv-
ice  stating  ‘‘Beijing  Confiscates  Canadian  Beef  on  Fear  of  Mad  Cow  Disease,’’  fur-
ther  exemplifies  the  trade  challenges  associated  with  Canadian  beef. 15 Because 
Canada’s feed ban is weaker, its BSE testing regime inferior, and its SRM removal 
policy  less  restrictive  than  those  of  other  BSE-affected  countries,  which  includes 
countries that import U.S. beef, the proposed OTM Rule will only worsen the unfa-
vorable situation that already exists and should be withdrawn. 
B.  The  Proposed  OTM  Rule,  Like  the  USDA’s  Existing  BSE  Import  Policy, 
Does Not Comply With International BSE Import Standards Established 
by the OIE 

The OTM Rule Does Not Comply With the OIE’s SRM Standards 

The OIE has in the past and continues today to recommend that SRMs from cat-
tle originating in a BSE-affected country not be imported for the preparation of ani-
mal feed or for the preparation of fertilizer. 16 Current U.S. BSE policies ignore this 
recommendation  and  SRMs  removed  from  live  Canadian  cattle  currently  entering 
the U.S. are free to enter the U.S. non-ruminant animal feed system as well as fer-
tilizer production. 17 While this failure to follow OIE recommendations is most likely 
already  contributing  to  the  ongoing  difficulty  in  restoring  lost  beef  markets  and 
gaining  new  ones,  the  proposed  OTM  Rule  would  significantly  aggravate  this  fail-
ure. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  15:54 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 035813 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35813.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

24

The proposed OTM Rule, because it would allow the importation of animals from 
a  BSE-affected  country  with  an  unknown  prevalence  of  BSE,  would  necessarily 
allow the importation of the entire list of SRM’s contained in each animal. Until and 
unless the U.S. begins to follow international standards by expressly banning SRMs 
originating in Canadian cattle from the preparation of all animal feed and fertilizer, 
the  USDA  is  not  in  compliance  with  OIE  standards,  and  its  demands  to  the  inter-
national community to follow international standards will not be taken seriously. 
The OTM Rule Does Not Comply With the OIE’s Feed Ban Standards 

Canada has so far confirmed four BSE cases born after the implementation of its 
1997 feed ban, with three cases born years after (one in 1998, two in 2000, and one 
in  2002). 18 A  recent  Dow  Jones  Newswires  report  regarding  Canada’s  10th  case  of 
BSE  in  a  native  animal,  which  was  confirmed  on  February  7,  2007,  suggests  that 
this  latest  case  was  also  born  after  the  feed  ban  (in  the  year  2000). 19 This  would 
make  a  total  of  five  positive  BSE  cases,  or  half  of  all  native  Canadian  cases,  born 
after  the  implementation  of  the  Canadian  feed  ban.  Whether  there  are  4  or  5  posi-
tive cases among Canada’s 10 native cases that were born after the implementation 
of  the  Canadian  feed  ban,  it  is  clear  that  the  empirical  evidence  available  to  this 
Committee shows several truths:

1. Canada’s known BSE prevalence has increased since 2003.
2.  Canada’s  1997  feed  ban  was  not  effective  in  preventing  the  spread  of  BSE.
3. Canada’s system of BSE control measures and ‘‘interlocking safeguards’’ have 
not  succeeded  in  preventing  or  eliminating  its  BSE  problem.  This  shows  that 
USDA’s reliance on such systems to protect the United States against imported 
BSE  is  unwise:  they  simply  do  not  work  well  enough  to  accomplish  this  goal.
4.  Canada’s  BSE  problem  is  ongoing.  It  is  not  confined  to  a  few  old  cattle  in-
fected before the control measures were implemented (one of USDA’s optimistic 
assumptions  in  re-opening  the  border  in  2005).  The  data  show  that  Canada’s 
BSE problem persists and shows no immediate signs of diminishing.
5. Canada’s prevalence rate of BSE is large enough so that there is close to 100 
percent  probability  that  continuing  to  import  cattle  from  Canada  will  result  in 
some BSE-infected cattle being imported into the United States.

These facts show that the USDA’s proposal to allow OTM cattle, replete with the 
entire  list  of  SRMs  and  the  entire  scope  of  bovine  products  from  animals  up  to  8 
years of age, into the United States is inconsistent with the OIE’s international BSE 
import standards. The OIE makes clear that beef from cattle originating in a BSE-
affected country that does not have an effectively enforced feed ban, i.e., a feed ban 
that does not reduce the prevalence of the disease, is to be derived only from cattle 
that  have  the  entire,  expanded  list  of  SRMs  removed  if  the  cattle  are  over  12 
months  of  age.  Because  the  proposed  OTM  Rule  would  require  the  removal  of  the 
entire,  expanded  list  of  SRMs  only  in  animals  over  twice  this  12-month  age  limit, 
i.e., at 30 months of age, the OTM Rule does not comply with OIE standards. 20

Moreover,  the  OIE  specifically  states  that  cattle  selected  for  export  from  a  BSE-
affected  country  should  be  born  at  least  2  years  after  the  country’s  feed  ban  was 
effectively  enforced  (for  a  country  like  Canada  with  an  undetermined  BSE  risk), 21 
or at least born after the date that the feed ban was effectively enforced (for a coun-
try  unlike  Canada  with  a  controlled  BSE  risk). 22 The  USDA’s  proposed  OTM  Rule 
that  would  allow  the  importation  of  Canadian  cattle  born  after  March  1,  1999,  de-
spite multiple cases of BSE detected in cattle born long after that date, clearly vio-
lates this OIE standard, regardless of whether Canada is considered a controlled or 
undetermined risk. 
The OTM Rule Is Inconsistent With OIE Testing Requirements 

The  USDA  proposed  OTM  Rule  is  further  inconsistent  with  OIE  testing  stand-
ards.  Canada  does  not  perform,  and  the  OTM  Rule  would  not  require,  sufficient 
testing  of  Canadian  cattle  to  meet  even  minimal  OIE  testing  standards.  As  a  min-
imum, the OIE testing standards require a country like Canada to test 187,000 con-
secutive  targeted  cattle  (with  a  BSE  risk  equal  to  that  in  the  ‘‘Casualty  slaughter, 
age  between  4  and  7  years’’  subpopulation  in  Table  2),  and  be  found  BSE-free  to 
be  confident  that  the  BSE  prevalence  is  not  more  than  1  in  100,000. 23 However, 
Canada  has  tested  only  143,528  total  cattle  during  the  combined  years  of  2004, 
2005, 2006, and including up through February 12, 2007, with 8 positive BSE cases 
detected  during  this  period. 24 While  this  empirical  evidence  shows  that  Canada’s 
BSE  prevalence  is  much  greater  than  1  in  100,000,  Canada  must  increase  its  BSE 
testing  significantly  before  any  accurate  estimation  of  the  true  magnitude  of  Can-
ada’s BSE problem can be made either by the U.S. or by international beef import-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  15:54 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 035813 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35813.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

25

ers.  Until  this  is  done,  the  U.S.  should  not  consider  any  relaxation  of  current  BSE 
import restrictions, and the proposed OTM Rule should be withdrawn. 

Standing in stark contrast to Canada, the U.S. has tested approximately 800,000 
cattle  since  June  1,  2004,  and  has  detected  only  two  atypical  cases  of  BSE,  both  in 
cattle  over  10  years  of  age. 25 Given  the  distinct  difference  between  the  BSE  risk 
profile  of  Canada,  when  compared  to  the  United  States,  the  effect  of  existing  BSE 
policies, which would be further aggravated by the OTM Rule, is to unjustly burden 
the U.S. cattle industry with the stigma of Canada’s more serious BSE problem. 

It  is  counterintuitive  to  expect  that  the  OTM  Rule  that  violates  the  OIE’s  SRM 
standards,  that  does  not  comply  with  the  OIE’s  feed  ban  standards,  and  that  is  in-
consistent  with  the  OIE’s  BSE  testing  standards  would  help  to  restore  consumer 
confidence  in  Canadian  beef  sold  directly  from  Canada  or  Canadian  beef  sold  from 
the  United  States.  Because  the  proposed  OTM  Rule  would  be  inconsistent  with  the 
OIE’s  SRM  standards,  feed  ban  standards,  and  testing  standards,  the  proposed 
OTM  Rule  would  only  worsen  the  unfavorable  situation  that  already  exists  and 
should be immediately withdrawn. 
C.  As  Reflected  by  the  OTM  Rule,  the  U.S.  Does  Not  Have  a  Coherent,
Comprehensive  Strategy  for  Resuming  Beef  Exports,  Building  New 
Markets,  Fully  Protecting  Animal  Health,  and  Supporting  Consumer 
Confidence in the Safety of U.S. Beef 

R–CALF  USA  recommends  that  Congress  issue  a  formal  directive  to  the  USDA 
to  ensure  that  the  U.S.  develops  an  aggressive,  coherent,  and  comprehensive  BSE 
strategy  for  resuming  beef  exports,  building  new  markets,  fully  protecting  animal 
health,  and  supporting  consumer  confidence  in  the  safety  of  U.S.  beef.  The  Animal 
Health  Protection  Act  empowers  the  Secretary  of  Agriculture  to  take  action  to  pre-
vent ‘‘the introduction into or dissemination within the United States’’ of animal dis-
eases  from  other  countries.  Until  recently,  USDA  policy  had  recognized  that:  ‘‘Pre-
venting the introduction of BSE into the United States is critical.’’ 26 But USDA has 
now  abandoned  the  Congressional  mandate  to  prevent  the  introduction  of  a  dev-
astating  disease,  BSE,  and  proposes  to  rely  only  on  measures  to  mitigate  the  dis-
semination  of  the  disease  once  it  has  entered  the  United  States.  R–CALF  USA  be-
lieves  that  Congress  must  now  intervene  to  ensure  this  important  Congressional 
mandate is followed and offers the following 7 principles for Congress’ consideration:
1. The U.S. should not give additional access to the U.S. market to imports from 
countries known to have BSE until the U.S. fully regains the share of the global 
export market it has lost since 2003. Before opening the border further to Can-
ada  or  other  BSE-affected  countries,  the  U.S.  must  get  assurances  from  other 
countries that export markets will not be lost if additional BSE cases are found 
in Canada or if the U.S. finds a Canadian case here.

Allowing  OTM  Canadian  cattle  and  beef  into  the  U.S.  will  further  harm  the 
United  States’  ability  to  fully  restore  lost  export  markets.  After  3  years  of  allowing 
Canada—a country where BSE is known to have circulated years after implementa-
tion  of  a  feed  ban—to  have  access  to  the  U.S.  market,  the  U.S.  share  of  the  global 
beef market has fallen from 18 percent in 2003 to an estimated 7 percent in 2006. 27 
The  export  markets  that  have  reopened  have  imposed  stricter  conditions  on  U.S. 
beef  exports  than  what  the  U.S.  requires  on  Canadian  imports,  and  several  export 
markets continue to ban U.S. exports that contain beef from Canadian cattle.

2.  The  U.S.  should  not  further  relax  its  already  lenient  import  standards  until 
it  can  be  scientifically  documented  that  BSE  is  no  longer  circulating  in  Cana-
dian  feed  or  in  OTM  Canadian  cattle  and  there  is  international  acceptance  for 
such a conclusion.

The  full  magnitude  of  Canada’s  BSE  epidemic  is  still  unfolding,  but  it  is  already 
much  greater  than  what  USDA  has  asserted  and  assumed.  BSE  has  now  been  de-
tected in 10 Canadian-born cattle. If media reports that indicate the latest case was 
born in 2000 are correct, then half of Canada’s known cases were born after Canada 
implemented  its  feed  ban.  This  evidence  demonstrates  that  Canada’s  feed  ban  was 
not effective in preventing the spread of BSE in either its feed system or cattle herd.
3.  The  U.S.  should  not  allow  the  importation  of  OTM  cattle  or  beef,  which  are 
known to be of higher risk for transmitting BSE, particularly now that the dis-
ease  is  known  to  have  been  circulating  in  animals  born  years  after  the  Cana-
dian feed ban.

Cattle  over  30  months  of  age  that  originate  in  a  BSE-affected  country  have  an 
inherently  higher  risk  for  transmitting  BSE.  As  recently  as  January  2005,  the 
USDA stated that the two most important factors in determining risk were the age 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  15:54 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 035813 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35813.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

26

of  the  cattle  and  the  effect  of  the  feed  ban.  Now  that  the  feed  ban  is  known  to  be 
ineffective,  the  30-month  age  limit  remains  as  the  most  important  factor  in  mini-
mizing the risk of introducing BSE into the U.S. from Canada.

4.  The  U.S.  should  not  allow  imports  of  OTM  cattle  or  beef  from  Canada  until 
both the U.S. and Canada have significantly strengthened their respective feed 
bans  and  sufficient  time  has  lapsed  to  ascertain  the  effectiveness  of  any  feed 
ban  improvements.  Given  the  known  breeches  in  Canada’s  feed  ban,  Canada 
must  significantly  ramp-up  its  BSE  testing  so  that  the  effectiveness  of  its  feed 
ban can be more accurately monitored.

As previously recognized by the Food and Drug Administration, and as recognized 
by  international  BSE  experts,  current  BSE  mitigation  measures  are  inadequate  to 
address  the  increased  risk  associated  with  OTM  cattle  and  beef  from  Canada.  The 
Food  and  Drug  Administration,  the  Canadian  Food  Inspection  Service,  and  inter-
national  BSE  experts  all  have  acknowledged  the  need  to  strengthen  the  feed  bans 
implemented  in  both  the  U.S.  and  Canada  to  prevent  the  spread  of  BSE.  However, 
neither  country  has  yet  implemented  improvements  to  their  respective  feed  bans.
5.  The  U.S.  should  not  allow  OTM  Canadian  cattle  or  beef  into  the  U.S.  until 
it  additionally  obtains  firm  assurances  from  all  U.S.  beef  export  markets  and 
the  OIE  that  the  United  States’  BSE  risk  profile  would  not  be  downgraded  to 
Canada’s level if Canadian OTM cattle and beef are allowed into the U.S. mar-
ket and available for export.

Allowing  OTM  Canadian  cattle  and  beef  into  the  United  States  will  immediately 
harm  the  United  States’  international  disease  risk  profile.  The  United  States  has 
a  more  favorable  BSE  risk  profile  than  Canada.  Canada  cannot  possibly  meet  the 
OIE  standard  for  a  country  with  a  negligible  BSE  risk,  which  requires  that  the 
youngest  BSE  case  must  be  born  more  than  11  years  ago. 28 However,  because  the 
U.S.  has  only  detected  BSE  in  two  native  animals,  both  born  well  before  the  feed 
ban  and  the  youngest  of  which  was  estimated  to  be  10  years  of  age  on  February 
28,  2006,  the  U.S.  will  likely  meet  the  international  standard  to  be  considered  a 
negligible  BSE  risk  country  if  it  does  not  mix  Canadian  cattle  and  beef  with  U.S. 
cattle and beef.

6.  The  U.S.  should  not  allow  OTM  Canadian  cattle  or  beef  into  the  U.S.  until 
the  U.S.  additionally  implements  country-of-origin  labeling  to  mitigate  the  fi-
nancial harm that will inevitably befall U.S. cattle producers and that will like-
ly be more severe than what USDA will predict.

The  financial  losses  to  U.S.  cattle  producers  will  likely  be  severe  if  the  United 
States allows OTM Canadian cattle and beef into the U.S. market while most export 
markets  remain  closed.  The  USDA  grossly  underestimated  the  negative  financial 
impact that actually occurred to U.S. cattle producers following the 2005 resumption 
of  Canadian  cattle  imports.  The  USDA  underestimated  the  price  decline  that  U.S. 
producers experienced in the domestic fed cattle market by a factor of nearly three. 
Domestic  fed  cattle  prices,  which  USDA  predicted  would  fall  by  as  much  as  $6.05 
per  cwt., 29 actually  fell  by  $17.40  per  cwt.  during  the  5-month  period  from  Decem-
ber  2005  through  May  2006.  Mandatory  country-of-origin  labeling  must  be  imple-
mented in the United States so both domestic and international consumers can dif-
ferentiate beef produced exclusively from U.S. cattle from beef produced from Cana-
dian  cattle,  before  any  further  relaxation  of  current  U.S.  import  standards  is  even 
considered.

7.  The  U.S.  should  not  relax  its  standards  on  imports  from  Canada  without  an 
evaluation of the health and safety risks and economic impact of OTM beef and 
without evaluations that combine OTM cattle and beef imports.

The risks from OTM beef imports were not properly evaluated in either the 2003 
or  2004  risk  analyses,  and  the  2005  delay  on  OTM  beef  imports  posted  in  the  Fed-
eral Register does not include a risk analysis based on the new findings of multiple 
cattle with BSE born after Canada’s ban on meat and bone meal. Also, there is con-
cern  that  the  risk  analysis  of  OTM  beef  and  OTM  cattle,  when  combined,  will  be 
much  higher  than  separate  analyses.  That  would  also  be  the  case  if  OTM  beef  and 
cattle are combined in an economic impact analysis. 
Conclusion 

For  the  reasons  described  above,  the  USDA’s  proposed  OTM  Rule  is  premature 
and  should  be  immediately  withdrawn.  It  is  inconsistent  with  the  applied  practices 
in  other  BSE-affected  countries;  it  is  inconsistent  with  OIE  standards;  and  it  does 
not contribute to any cohesive, comprehensive U.S. strategy to restore lost markets, 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  15:54 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 035813 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35813.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

27

build  new  markets,  fully  protect  animal  health,  and  support  consumer  confidence 
in the safety of U.S. beef. 

R–CALF  USA  respectfully  requests  that  Congress  take  steps  to  cause  the  imme-
diate withdrawal of the OTM Rule as well as steps to ensure the immediate develop-
ment  of  a  comprehensive  BSE  protection  strategy  and  enforcement  of  the  Congres-
sional mandate to prevent the introduction of BSE into the United States. 

I sincerely appreciate this opportunity to share R–CALF USA’s views with you on 
this  important  issue  and  I  would  be  happy  to  answer  any  questions  that  you  may 
have. 
ENDNOTES 

1 Table 5, Total U.S. Beef and Veal Exports, Red Meat Yearbook (94006), U.S. De-
partment  of  Agriculture,  Economic  Research  Service,  available  at  http://
usda.mannlib.cornell.edu/MannUsda/viewDocumentInfo.do?documentID=1354. 

2 See Cumulative U.S. Meat and Livestock Trade, Livestock and Meat Trade Data, 
Livestock, Dairy, and Poultry Outlook Tables, U.S. Department of Agriculture, Eco-
nomic  Research  Service,  available  at  http://www.ers.usda.gov/Data/MeatTrade/
Data/AnnualLivestockTable.xls; see also Table 5, Total U.S. Beef and Veal Exports, 
Red  Meat  Yearbook  (94006),  U.S.  Department  of  Agriculture,  Economic  Research 
Service, 
http://usda.mannlib.cornell.edu/MannUsda/
viewDocumentInfo.do?documentID=1354. 

3 Terrestrial  Animal  Health  Code—2006,  World  Organization  for  Animal  Health 

available 

at 

(OIE), at Article 2.3.13.1. (1)(g). 

at 

Service, 

available 

Research 

4 See  Bovine  Spongiform  Encephalopathy,  Minimal-Risk  Regions  and  Importation 
of  Commodities;  Final  Rule  and  Notice,  Federal  Register,  Vol.  70,  January  4,  2005, 
at 460–553. 

5 Choice  Beef  Values  and  Spreads  and  the  All-Fresh  Retail  Value,  USDA,  Eco-
http://www.ers.usda.gov/Data/

nomic 
meatpricespreads/Data/beef.xls, downloaded on December 19, 2006. 

6 High Plains Cattle Feeding Simulator, United States Department of Agriculture, 
Economic  Research  Service,  available  at  http://www.ers.usda.gov/Publications/
LDP/xlstables/High  %20Plains  %20Cattle  %20Feeding  %20simulator  %20Nov06 
%20R.xls. 

7 See  Bovine  Spongiform  Encephalopathy;  Minimal-Risk  Regions;  Importation  of 
Live  Bovines  and  Products  Derived  from  Bovines;  Proposed  Rule,  Federal  Register, 
Vol. 72, No. 5, at 1102–1129, hereafter OTM Rule. 

8 Federal Register, Vol. 70, No. 2, Final Rule, January 4, 2005, at 475. 
9 See  Report  on  the  Monitoring  and  Testing  of  Ruminants  for  the  Presence  of 
Transmissible Spongiform Encephalopathy (TSE) in the EU in 2005, European Com-
mission, ISSN–583X, at 5. 

10 Table  B5,  Total  Positive  Cases  Per  Number  of  Cattle  Tested  or  Present  in  the 
Adult Cattle Population (>24 months of age), Report on the Monitoring and Testing 
of  Ruminants  for  the  Presence  of  Transmissible  Spongiform  Encephalopathy  (TSE) 
in  the  EU  in  2005,  European  Commission,  ISSN:  1725–583X,  June  20,  2006,  at  17. 
(France, with an adult cattle population of over 10 million cattle tested over 2.5 mil-
lion  head  and  detected  31  positive  BSE  cases  in  2005;  the  Netherlands,  with  an 
adult  cattle  population  of  only  1.7  million  cattle  tested  over  517,000  cattle  and  de-
tected 3 positive BSE cases in 2005. In contrast, Canada with an adult cattle popu-
lation of approximately 6 million cattle tested fewer than 60,000 cattle and detected 
2  positive  BSE  cases  in  2005;  in  2006,  after  again  testing  fewer  than  60,000  cattle, 
Canada detected 5 positive BSE cases.) 

11 The TSE Roadmap, European Commission, Brussels, COM(2005 322 Final, July 
15,  2005,  at  7,  8:  ‘‘The  detection  of  BSE  in  healthy  slaughtered  cattle  in  2000  indi-
cated the need for active monitoring which was introduced in the whole community 
in  the  beginning  of  2001.  The  active  monitoring  programme  became  fully  operation 
in  July  2001  and  still  includes:  The  testing  of  all  risk  animals  over  24  months  of 
age (fallen stock, emergency slaughtered animals and animals with clinical signs at 
ante-mortem  inspection);  The  testing  of  all  healthy  slaughtered  bovine  animals 
above 30 months of age (a total of 10 million cattle per year).’’

12 Table  B12,  Testing  on  Healthy  Slaughtered  Bovine  Animals,  Report  on  the 
Monitoring and Testing of Ruminants for the Presence of Transmissible Spongiform 
Encephalopathy (TSE) in the EU in 2005, European Commission, ISSN: 1725–583X, 
June 20, 2006, at 26. 

13 See  Cumulative  U.S.  Livestock  and  Meat  Trade,  Livestock,  Dairy,  and  Poultry 
Outlook Report, U.S. Department of Agriculture, Economic Research Service, March 
23,  2004,  available  at  http://usda.mannlib.cornell.edu/usda/ers/LDP-M//2000s/
2004/LDP-M-03-23-2004.pdf. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  15:54 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 035813 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35813.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

28

14 Use  of  Cattle  Legally  Imported  from  Canada  Within  the  EV  Program  for  the 
Republic of Korea, U.S. Department of Agriculture, Agricultural Marketing Service, 
August 
http://www.ams.usda.gov/lsg/arc/
KoreaCanadianCattle.pdf. 

15 Beijing  Confiscates  Canadian  Beef  on  Fear  of  Mad  Cow  Disease,  ChinaDaily/

available 

at 

29, 

2006, 

Xinhua News Service, Sunday—February 18, 2007. 

16 Terrestrial Animal Health Code—2006, Article 2.3.13.13 (1), (2), (3). 
17 See Importation of Certain Commodities from BSE Minimal-Risk Regions (Can-
ada), Environmental Assessment, October 27, 2006, U.S. Department of Agriculture, 
Animal and Plant Health Inspection Service, at 7. (Both FSIS and FDA have imple-
mented  regulations  that  prohibit  the  use  of  SRMs  in  human  food  and  other  prod-
ucts, including dietary supplements and cosmetics.) 

18 See  Completed  Investigations,  Canadian  Food  Inspection  Agency,  available  at 

http://www.inspection.gc.ca/english/anima/heasan/disemala/bseesb/
comenqe.shtml. 

19 CFIA:  Latest  Canadian  BSE  Case  Likely  Born  in  2000,  Dow  Jones  Newswires, 

CattleNetwork Today, February 8, 2007. 

20 Terrestrial Animal Health Code—2006, OIE, Article 2.3.13.11. (2)(a). 
21 See Terrestrial Animal Health Code—2006, OIE, at Article 2.3.13.8. 
22 See Id. at Article 2.3.13.7. 
23 See  Surveillance  for  Bovine  Spongiform  Encephalopathy,  Terrestrial  Animal 

Health Code—OIE—2006, Appendix 3.8.4.1, Tables 1 and 2. 

24 See  BSE  Enhanced  Surveillance  Program,  Canadian  Food  Inspection  Agency, 
available  at  http://www.inspection.gc.ca/english/anima/heasan/disemala/bseesb/
surv/surve.shtml#num. 

25 BSE Testing Results, U.S. Department of Agriculture, Animal and Plant Health 
Inspection  Service,  September  1,  2006,  available  at  http://www.aphis.usda.gov/
lpa/issues/bseltesting/testlresults.html;  See  also  BSE  Ongoing  Surveillance  Pro-
gram, U.S. Department of Agriculture, Animal and Plant Health Inspection Service, 
available  at  http://www.aphis.usda.gov/newsroom/hotlissues/bse/surveillance/
ongoinglsurvlresults.shtml. 

26 See, e.g., Federal Register, Vol. 62, December 16, 1997, at 65747, 65748. 
27 Livestock  and  Poultry:  World  Markets  and  Trade,  U.S.  Department  of  Agri-
culture,  Foreign  Agricultural  Service,  Circular  Series,  DL&P  2–06,  October  2006, 
available 
http://www.fas.usda.gov/dlp/circular/2006/2006  %20Annual/
Livestock&Poultry.pdf. 

28 Terrestrial Animal Health Code—2006, OIE, Article 2.3.13.3. (3)(b). 
29 Economic  Analysis  Final  Rule,  Bovine  Spongiform  Encephalopathy:  Minimal-
Risk Regions and Importation of Commodities, U.S. Department of Agriculture, Ani-
mal and Plant Health Inspection Services, December 20, 2004, at 24.

at 

Senator  DORGAN.  Mr.  McDonnell,  thank  you  very  much.  And,  fi-
nally,  we  will  hear  from  Mr.  Elwood  ‘‘Woody’’  Barth,  who  is  here 
representing  the  North  Dakota  Farmers  Union,  and  we  appreciate 
you being here. You may proceed. 

STATEMENT OF ELWOOD ‘‘WOODY’’ BARTH, STATE 

SECRETARY, NORTH DAKOTA FARMERS UNION 

Mr.  BARTH.  Thank  you,  Senator  Dorgan.  It  is  good  to  be  here. 
For the record, my name is Woody Barth. I am a livestock producer 
from Solen, North Dakota, and also serve as State Secretary of the 
North  Dakota  Farmers  Union,  the  state’s  largest  general  farm  or-
ganization. 

Today I am here representing the members of the North Dakota 
Farmers  Union,  and  I  thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  appear  be-
fore  you  and  focusing  on  the  United  States  Department  of  Agri-
culture’s proposed rules. 

USDA  proposed  rules  that  allow  for  liberalized  importation  of 
Canadian beef and cattle do not address the issues of safety of our 
Nation’s producers. The United States cattle producers continue to 
have  no  assurances  that  Canada  has  its  BSE  problem  under  con-
trol. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  15:54 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 035813 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35813.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

29

The  rules  will  call  for  allowed  importation  of  beef  and  cattle  of 
all ages, including animals born after March 1, 1999. Live animals 
must have an ID plus a permanent tattoo that will allow Canadian 
officials to certify the age of animals. These rules have no clarifica-
tion as to what will happen if another BSE case is found as relates 
to our trading partners, and no explanation of how USDA plans to 
separate Canadian beef from U.S. beef for export. 

Just  2  weeks  ago,  Canada  confirmed  its  ninth  case,  possibly  the 
tenth  case  if  you  count  the  animal  in  Washington  State,  for  BSE 
positive.  The  recent  animal  was  six-and-a-half  years  old,  which 
falls  within  USDA’s  proposed  age  limit  to  expand  beef  and  cattle 
trade with Canada. 

Just recently, Canadian cattle entered the United States without 
government-required  health  papers  or  identification  tags  in  Wash-
ington  State.  Because  of  these  events,  we  believe  American  pro-
ducers  and  consumers  deserve  better  than  what  USDA  is  pro-
posing. 

North Dakota Farmers Union believes livestock health is critical 
to production agriculture and our Nation’s ability to provide a safe 
food  supply.  We  believe  the  following  items  need  to  be  addressed 
prior to expanding beef and cattle trade with Canada: 

First  of  all,  Canadian  cattle  need  to  be  proved  and  verified  that 

their cattle herd and beef products are BSE-free. 

Canada  must  prove  and  verify  100  percent  compliance  with  the 

ruminant feed ban. 

The  U.S.  international  beef  export  markets  are  firmly  reestab-
lished  first,  and  we  also  call  for  mandatory  country-of-origin  label-
ing to be fully implemented before this rule takes effect. 

We  call  for  increased  level  of  surveillance,  quarantine,  and  in-

spection and testing at all U.S.-Canadian border locations. 

Impose  similar  guarantees  concerning  livestock  feed  production 
from  all  trading  partners  and  require  Canada  to  allow  the  U.S.  to 
perform  random  investigations  and  testing  of  their  production  fa-
cilities as a condition of market access. 

Rapid-test technology is provided to all domestic slaughtering fa-
cilities  to  provide  stability  to  the  cattle  market  and  another  layer 
of confidence to the American consuming public. 

We  also  call  for  a  guaranteed  economic  safety  net  for  American 
producers if this importation of cattle and beef products from BSE-
positive  countries  negatively  impacts  domestic  profitability  here  in 
America. 

In  the  interest  of  U.S.  producers  and  consumers,  USDA  should 
withdraw the proposed rule to expand Canadian beef and cattle im-
ports. The Department should also move to immediately implement 
mandatory country-of-origin labeling, which would allow consumers 
to make an informed choice of where their food comes from. 

With  that,  Senator,  I  would  thank  you  for  being  here,  and  I 

would answer any questions. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Barth follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF ELWOOD ‘‘WOODY’’ BARTH, STATE SECRETARY, NORTH 

DAKOTA FARMERS UNION 

My  name  is  Elwood  ‘‘Woody’’  Barth.  I  am  a  livestock  producer  from  Solen,  North 
Dakota, and also serve as the State Secretary of the North Dakota Farmers Union, 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  15:54 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 035813 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35813.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

30

the  state’s  largest  general  farm  organization.  Today  I  am  here  representing  the 
members of North Dakota Farmers Union. Thank you for the opportunity to appear 
before you and for focusing on the United States Department of Agriculture (USDA) 
proposed rules. 

The  USDA’s  proposed  rules  that  allow  for  liberalized  importation  of  Canadian 
beef/cattle  do  not  address  the  issues  of  safety  for  our  Nation’s  producers.  United 
States  cattle  producers  continue  to  have  no  assurance  that  Canada  has  its  BSE 
problem under control. 

The rules will call for allowed importation of beef/cattle of all ages, including ani-
mals  born  after  March  1,  1999.  Live  animals  must  have  an  ID  plus  a  permanent 
tattoo  that  will  allow  Canadian  officials  to  certify  age  of  animals.  These  rules  have 
no  clarification  as  to  what  will  happen  if  another  BSE  case  is  found  as  it  relates 
to  our  trading  partners,  and  no  explanation  of  how  USDA  plans  to  separate  Cana-
dian beef from U.S. beef for export. 

Just  2  weeks  ago,  Canada  confirmed  its  ninth  BSE-positive  case.  The  recent  ani-
mal was 6.5 years old, which falls within USDA’s proposed age limit to expand beef/
cattle  trade  with  Canada.  Just  recently,  Canadian  cattle  entered  the  United  States 
without  government-required  health  papers  or  identification  tags  in  Washington 
State.  Because  of  these  events,  we  believe  American  producers  and  consumers  de-
serve better than what USDA is proposing. 

North Dakota Farmers Union believes livestock health is critical to production ag-
riculture  and  our  Nation’s  ability  to  provide  a  safe  food  supply.  We  believe  the  fol-
lowing should be addressed prior to expanding beef/cattle trade with Canada:
• Canada can prove/verify their cattle herd and beef products are BSE-free;
• Canada  can  prove/verify  100  percent  compliance  with  the  ruminant  feed  ban;
• U.S. international beef export markets are firmly reestablished;
• Mandatory country-of-origin labeling is fully implemented;
• Increased  level  of  surveillance,  quarantine,  inspection  and  testing  at  all  U.S.-

Canadian border locations;

• Impose similar guarantees concerning livestock feed production from all trading 
partners  and  require  Canada  to  allow  the  U.S.  to  perform  random  investiga-
tions  and  testing  of  their  production  facilities  as  a  condition  of  market  access;
• Rapid-test  technology  is  provided  to  all  domestic  slaughtering  facilities  to  pro-
vide stability to the cattle market, and another layer of confidence for the Amer-
ican consuming public; and

• A  guaranteed  economic  safety  net  for  American  producers  if  the  importation  of 
cattle and beef products from BSE-positive countries negatively impacts domes-
tic profitability.

In the interest of U.S. producers and consumers, USDA should withdraw the pro-
posed rule to expand Canadian beef and cattle imports. The department should also 
move  to  immediately  implement  mandatory  country-of-origin  labeling  which  would 
allow consumers to make an informed choice of where their food comes from.

Senator  DORGAN.  Mr.  Barth,  thank  you  very  much.  Let  me  ask 
questions  first  of  Dr.  DeHaven  and  then  perhaps  others,  as  well. 
Dr.  DeHaven,  it  has  seemed  to  me  that  the  Secretary  of  Agri-
culture has been more than anxious to open this market up, almost 
like  a  cattle  drive  from  Canada.  You  know,  ‘‘I’m  ready  to  go  and, 
Katie,  bar  the  door.’’  And  I  don’t  understand  that.  I  would  expect 
an  approach  that  has  the  USDA  saying,  ‘‘look,  we’re  going  to  be 
cautious,  careful.  First  and  foremost  we’re  going  to  protect  our  do-
mestic industry to make certain that we’re not inheriting risks that 
we don’t now have.’’

Mr. McDonnell said you don’t minimize risks by increasing expo-
sure, which I agree with. So I’m trying to understand this, and let 
me ask a number of questions. Under the proposed rule, USDA will 
allow  in  Canadian  cattle  as  long  as  they  were  born  after  March  1, 
1999.  They  implemented  their  feed  ban  in  August  1997,  so  you 
allow  6  months  after  the  feed  ban  and  give  it  a  chance  to  work 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  15:54 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 035813 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35813.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

31

through  the  system.  Then  you  add  an  additional  year  for  good 
measure, and so that becomes the date. 

However,  looking  at  the  timeline  of  the  BSE  cases,  four  of  Can-
ada’s  cases  have  been  found  in  animals  born  after  the  feed  ban. 
Three  of  them  were  in  animals  born  after  March  1,  1999.  So  why 
does the USDA think it’s appropriate and safe to import cattle born 
after  March  1,  1999,  given  that  one-third  of  the  BSE  cases  were 
born after that date? Does that not give USDA some pause? 

Dr.  DEHAVEN.  Thank  you,  Senator.  Let  me  first  reflect  on  your 
initial comment about Secretary Johanns and his interest. The Sec-
retary  has  been  very  clear  from  the  beginning  that  our  trade  poli-
cies  need  to  be  based  on  sound  science  and  consistency  with  the 
international standards. So we believe that, in fact, our initial min-
imum-risk  rule  and  this  proposal,  in  fact,  are  in  keeping  with  the 
science as we know it today, and it is evolving rapidly, and, second, 
will  get  much  more  consistency  with  the  international  standards 
than what we currently have. 

With  regard  to  the  March  1,  1999,  feed  ban,  let  me  just  clarify 
slightly  from  what  you  indicated  in  terms  of  how  we  came  to  that 
date.  The  United  States  and  Canada  both  implemented  almost 
identical feed bans at the same time, August 1997. 

In  the  risk  assessment  that  we  did  to  support  this  rule,  we  esti-
mated  that  it  would  take  approximately  6  months  for  the  Cana-
dians to really implement that rule and then an additional year for 
feed that might be in their system to clear the system, and so came 
up with a date some 18 months after their initial feed ban was im-
plemented. 

It’s  important  when  discussing  the  potential  risk  pathway,  the 
way  that  BSE  might  find  its  way  into  the  United  States—excuse 
me, into the United States from Canada, that we not take any sin-
gle-risk  mitigation  factor  and  consider  it  by  itself,  but  rather  con-
sider  the  entire  risk  pathway  and  all  of  the  mitigations  along  that 
pathway  that  would  mitigate  any  risk  that  would  be  posed  to  the 
United  States  from  Canada  from  their  cattle  or  from  cattle  prod-
ucts. 

Senator  DORGAN.  I’ll  let  you  continue,  but  let  me  ask  a  question 
about this issue of risk. The Department provided the minimal-risk 
status to Canada based on what you say were international guide-
lines; is that correct? 

Dr.  DEHAVEN.  Consistent  with  the  international  standards,  yes. 
Senator DORGAN. Let me ask you a question. What if before May 
of this year we find an 11th case of BSE in Canadian herds? Is the 
Department at that point going to withdraw the minimum-risk as-
sessment? 

Dr. DEHAVEN. Senator Dorgan, I assume that you’re referring to 
the  quote  on  the  chart  that  you  referred  me  to,  and  I  would  just 
go back in history. That quote is from January 3, 2005, and it was 
consistent with what was at the time——

Senator DORGAN. Let’s put that quote up, if we can. 
Dr.  DEHAVEN.  That  quote  was—at  the  time  it  was  stated  was 
consistent with the OIE standards as they existed. The OIE at the 
time categorized countries in one of five categories. Free, provision-
ally  free,  minimum  risk—minimal-risk,  as  would  indicate  on  that 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  15:54 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 035813 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35813.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

32

chart,  moderate  risk,  or  high  risk.  A  five-category  scheme,  if  you 
will. 

In  May  of  2005,  some  5  months  after  that  quote,  the  OIE 
changed  their  country  categorization  system,  got  away  from  com-
paring  cattle  populations  and  the  number  of  positive  cases  based 
on  that  population,  and  went  to  a  three-categorization  scheme 
where the country is designated as either negligible risk, controlled 
risk,  or  undetermined  risk,  and  instead  of  looking  at  just  preva-
lence,  looking  again  at  that  entire  risk  pathway.  What  are  all  of 
the  measures  that  a  country  has  in  place  to  mitigate  the  animal 
health and public health risk of BSE? 

Senator  DORGAN.  I  want  to  know  whether  the  USDA  has  evalu-
ated  the  difference  between  your  evaluation  of  sound  science  and 
our  trading  partners’  determination  of  what  sound  science  means 
to them. It seems to me that our continued trade gap somehow rep-
resents a difference in judgment of our trading partners’ evaluation 
of sound science and health risk versus USDA’s evaluation. 

I’m wondering whether this plays any role in your consideration, 
or  is  it  irrelevant?  Because  this  gets  at  the  root  of  what  this  issue 
means  to  our  industry  and  our  domestic  producers,  and  it  has  ev-
erything  to  do  with  what  our  trading  partners  are  interested  in 
purchasing.  You  can  only  sell  what  people  are  willing  to  buy.  You 
might  say  that’s  an  irrational  gap,  but  you  can’t  say  it  doesn’t 
exist. 

My question is: What role does USDA play in evaluating whether 

that gap means anything to the USDA or to this country? 

Dr. DEHAVEN. Senator, I don’t mean to suggest that the Depart-
ment  is  ignoring  the  economics  and  the  chart  as  you’ve  presented, 
but  looking  at  a  longer-term  picture,  if  you’ll  recall,  if  we  go  back 
to  May  of  2003,  there  were  really  two  standards:  Countries  that 
were affected by BSE and the rest of the world cut off all beef and 
beef products and animals from those countries, and then countries 
that were not affected and there were no restrictions. And we were 
part  of  that  problem,  not  consistent  with  the  international  stand-
ards. 

Since  May  of  2003  we  have  worked  to  make  our  trade  policies, 
our  regulations  consistent  with  the  science  and  consistent  with 
international  standards.  If,  in  fact,  we  are  successful  in  doing  so 
both  domestically,  then  we  are  in  a  better  position  of  convincing 
trading partners to likewise use the science and use the OIE stand-
ards as a basis for determining their trade policies. 

I  have  not  been  directly  involved  in  the  trade  discussions,  but  I 
have had discussions with a number of countries on BSE and their 
ongoing  restrictions  of  beef  and  beef  products,  and  as  we  hammer 
those countries to accept our beef and beef products based on inter-
national  standards,  their  first  response  is  yes,  but  you  need  to  get 
your  policies  in  the  United  States  consistent  with  the  science  and 
then  come  talk  to  us,  because,  in  fact,  our  regulations  have  not 
been.  This  rule  will  go  a  long  way  toward  making  our  standards 
consistent with——

Senator DORGAN. I don’t think we need any lectures from any of 
our  trading  partners  about  our  standards.  The  fact  is  we  have  the 
best  supply  of  beef  in  the  world,  the  safest  supply  of  beef  in  the 
world, and we don’t need anybody lecturing us about that. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  15:54 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 035813 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35813.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

33

But my question here is about a gap. It seems to me the market 

has made a judgment. 

You say this is sound science and this gap seems to play no role. 
I’m  just  saying,  Dr.  DeHaven,  if  this  plays  no  role,  then  we’re  in 
big  trouble  because  this  has  to  play  a  significant  role  in  the  deci-
sions we’re making. 

Perception  is  everything.  Others  around  the  world  perceive  that 
there  is  a  problem.  Let  me  refer  you  to  the  Chicago  Tribune  the 
day before yesterday, which you’re probably familiar with. The Chi-
cago  Tribune  headline,  ‘‘Canadian  cattle  slip  past  USDA  safe-
guards.  Critics  fear  problems  could  lead  to  mad  cow,’’  and  it’s  a 
story about cattle coming in without identification, without papers, 
and  so  on,  slipping  through  the  system,  or  as  one  of  my  friends 
called it, holes in the dike. 

So, you know, my concern here is we’re ignoring the obvious, and 
I’m trying to understand the urgency the Secretary sees in rushing 
to make this decision. 

We  have  a  comment  period  that  is  still  open,  but  when  you  look 
at the statements of the Secretary of Agriculture, I’m hard pressed 
to  see  that  any  comments  are  going  to  do  anything  to  change  a 
mind that’s already closed on this issue. Disabuse me of that, if you 
can. 

Dr. DEHAVEN. Thank you, Senator. And let me first make it very 
evident  and  clear  that  the  Secretary  is  acutely  aware  of  the  eco-
nomic  impact  of  the  current  situation  indeed.  We  have  sent  count-
less  trade  teams  around  the  world  to  reopen  the  markets,  to  push 
the  science,  and,  in  fact,  we  have  been  largely  successful  in  terms 
of reopening those markets with——

Senator DORGAN. That’s not true. Look at that chart. 
Dr. DEHAVEN. Indeed. 
Senator DORGAN. I’m sorry to interrupt you, but this is not true. 
Dr.  DEHAVEN.  I’m  not  suggesting  that  we  don’t  have  a  ways  to 
go.  In  fact,  it’s  work  in  progress.  My  point  being  the  economics  of 
this  situation  are  certainly  not  lost  on  the  Secretary  or  anyone  in 
the Administration. 

Senator  DORGAN.  But  they  don’t  play  a  role  in  this  judgment  of 

whether to open the market; is that correct? 

Dr.  DEHAVEN.  In  fact  they  do,  and  an  economic  impact  analysis 
was  part  of  the  rule  as  it  was  published  as  a  proposal.  You  know, 
I  suspect  that  economists  are  much  like  lawyers.  If  you  have  six 
of  them  in  the  room,  you’ll  have  six  different  opinions.  We  value 
and  respect  the  opinion  of  Dr.  Keith  Collins,  our  Chief  Economist, 
and  his  staff,  who  have  done  a  thorough  economic  analysis  of  this 
rule.  Here  again,  that’s  part  of  this  process  where  we  would  wel-
come comments on the economic impact analysis. 

Dr.  Collins  and  his  staff  would  suggest  that  this  rule  taken  by 
itself,  not  ignoring  the  situation,  but  in  fact  putting  into  context 
what this rule would do, the overall economic impact on the United 
States  would  be  favorable.  Clearly  there  would  be  a  reduction——

Senator DORGAN. You said what? Tell me again. 
Dr.  DEHAVEN.  Would  be  a  favorable  outcome  in  the  long  term, 
recognizing  that,  in  fact,  there  would  be  lower  prices  in  cull  cattle 
in the United States, but in terms of the impact on fed cattle, feed-
er  cattle  and  products  from  those  animals,  this  rule  would  be—

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  15:54 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 035813 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35813.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

34

would result in no change or even a slight increase to producers in 
this country. 

Senator DORGAN. You know, I know Keith Collins, and I wish he 
had  about  a  thousand  head  of  cattle  that  he  owned  and  then  give 
his  judgment.  I  used  to  teach  a  little  economics  myself,  but  I  was 
able to overcome that. You know, I understand. You can get what-
ever you pay for from the economists, but I do think that there are 
several issues here that are important. 

One  is  the  fact  that  Canada  has  decided  that  it’s  going  to  revise 
its  feed  ban  in  order  to  make  it  more  effective.  That’s  my  under-
standing; right? So Canada’s taking steps to make it more effective. 
What’s  the  implication  of  that?  They’ve  determined  that  the  feed 
ban  needs  to  be  made  more  effective  because  it  is  not  effective  at 
this  point,  or  at  least  it  is  not  completely  effective.  If  that’s  the 
case,  again,  I  don’t  understand  the  urgency  and  the  rush  by  the 
Secretary to do this. 

I’m going to ask some other questions and then I’ll come back to 

you, Dr. DeHaven, if I might. 

Commissioner  Johnson,  let  me  ask  your  assessment  of  USDA’s 
evaluation of both the public health side of this and the State Vet-
erinarian’s evaluation of the prospect of additional cases coming in 
and its impact on the U.S. herd. 

Mr.  JOHNSON.  Well,  I  don’t  know  that  I  can  answer  the  public 
health side of this. I mean, the statement has been made and I be-
lieve  it  to  be  accurate  that  we  should  not  be  fearful  that  this  is 
going to increase the problem that we have, that it’s going to make 
our  beef  less  safe  in  this  country.  I  think  this  is  largely—as  you 
indicate,  it’s  about  that  economic  gap  and  it’s  about  how  folks  are 
perceiving  this  to  be,  and  the  result  of  that  is  that  economic  gap. 
If I can——

Senator  DORGAN.  But  the  perception—I’m  asking  about  the  per-
ception  of  public  health,  and  I  think  this  is  a  very  fine  line.  None 
of  us  want  any  American  consumers  to  believe  that  we’ve  got  a 
problem here because we don’t, but we could import a problem, and 
we don’t want to be importing someone else’s problem. 

Mr.  JOHNSON.  Let  me  answer  the  question  this  way,  Senator:  I 
think  USDA  made  a  critical  mistake  a  number  of  years  ago  when 
there  was  a  small  company  by  the  name  of  Creekstone  that  was 
asking for the right to test every animal, and the reason they were 
asking  for  that  right  was  because  in  Japan  that  is  exactly  what 
they  were  doing.  They  have  a  problem  with  BSE  in  Japan  and  so 
they  tested  every  animal.  That  was  what  the  consumers  wanted, 
and  so  they  wanted  the  same  thing  from  us.  If  they  were  going  to 
import  beef  from  the  U.S.,  they  said,  well,  of  course,  but  you  need 
to test every animal. We refused to allow them that right. 

And  so  certainly  in  the  minds  of  the  Japanese  consumers  there 
is  a  higher  risk  associated  with  importing  beef  that  has  not  been 
tested where there’s known to have been at least a case or several 
cases of BSE. Now that gets to the question of, you know, is there 
a—does the consumer believe there to be a risk? In America I don’t 
think that’s the case, but certainly in Japan it is. 

Senator DORGAN. Dr. Keller, do you have anything to add to Dr. 
DeHaven’s  testimony  today  with  respect  to  the  standpoint  of  num-
ber of cases of BSE we might see and its impact? 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  15:54 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 035813 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35813.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

35

Dr.  KELLER.  The  only  comment  I’d  like  to  add  is  that  if  we  look 
at  the  science,  we  really  have  to  look  at  where  we’re  at  with  OIE 
guidelines, and we still have not been assigned a status by OIE as 
a  country  nor  has  Canada.  If  we  would  be  what—I’ve  seen  Dr. 
DeHaven quoted recently saying that we might be a controlled-risk 
status country. In the Minimal Risk Rule 2 automatically we would 
not be in compliance or we would not be meeting those guidelines. 
Animals  over  30  months  of  age,  the  SRMs—there’s  a  list  of  them, 
I could read them to you—we should not be allowing those into this 
country.  Minimal  Risk  Rule  2  does  not  address  what  would  be  re-
quired as a controlled-risk status country. 

Senator DORGAN. So if we have additional cases of BSE that are 
imported  into  this  country,  which  USDA  says  will  happen—the 
question  isn’t  whether,  the  question  is  how  many—then  that  puts 
us in a more significant risk category? 

Dr.  KELLER.  Absolutely.  We  cannot  have  it  both  ways.  We’ve  ei-
ther  got  to  do  what  Canada’s  doing  or  we  don’t  let  those  older-age 
cattle in. 

Senator  DORGAN.  And  the  consequences  of  that  then  are  on  this 
chart  in  terms  of  our  trading  partners’  perception  of  our  product; 
is that correct? 

Dr. KELLER. Yes. Some of it’s perception, some is reality, though. 

We cannot be at an unequal status. 

Senator  DORGAN.  I  understand  that  if  you  import  risk,  that’s 
real.  I  understand  that.  And  that  has  an  impact  on  our  trading 
partners’ assessment of our product. 

Dr. KELLER. Correct. 
Senator  DORGAN.  And  that  gap  is  real,  and  gets  back  to  Mr. 
McDonnell’s  statement  that  he  put,  I  thought,  in  a  very  concise 
way.  You  don’t  minimize  risk  by  increasing  exposure.  Mr.  Huseth, 
you know, some economists, would take a look at you and say, you 
know  what  you  are,  you’re  just  a  protectionist.  You  want  to  keep 
everything out of here and the world has changed, get with it, free 
trade, open the borders, and do a little testing, but you know what, 
you’re  just  protectionists.  That’s  what  some  would  argue.  Not  me, 
but some will argue that. So respond to that. 

Mr.  HUSETH.  Senator,  we  probably  are  protectionists  because 
we’re protecting our own producers, protecting the product that we 
think  is  safe  and  that  we  do  produce.  So  in  a  way  we  are  protec-
tionists,  but  we  still  are  open  minded  enough  to  know  about  the 
free trade and what goes on in that arena. 

Senator  DORGAN.  How  important  is  country-of-origin  labeling  to 

you as a rancher? 

Mr. HUSETH. Country-of-origin labeling to me, is very important. 
I  think  we  need  to  look  at  that,  and  for  our  situation  we  can  do 
that right now, if we want, start tagging and not wait for the gov-
ernment to go through their bureaucracy, but I think some of that 
has  to  be  done.  Seems  to  be  a  real  holdup  at  your  end  of  the  par-
ticipation  in  the  government.  They  always  come  up  with  ideas  but 
never  have  the  solutions  or  the  ways  to  get  there,  and  I  think 
that’s  a  problem,  and  country-of-origin  labeling  is  an  important 
thing in our industry. 

Senator DORGAN. Mr. McDonnell, you’ve missed the whole—they 
would  say  you’ve  missed  the  whole  world  movement  of  free  trade 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  15:54 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 035813 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35813.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

36

and  you’re  just  coming  here  saying  I  want  to  protect  my  own  eco-
nomic interests. Anything wrong with that? 

Mr.  MCDONNELL.  Well,  thank  you,  first  of  all,  for  calling  me  a 
protectionist. That’s what I would tell them. I’m not an isolationist, 
though.  In  fact,  we  have  extended  members  of  our  family—one 
cousin’s  boy  is  over  in  Afghanistan  today  protecting  this  country. 
So  I  don’t  know  if  I  deserve  to  be  quite  in  that  crowd,  but  thank 
you. 

We  participate  in  our  own  business  very  much  in  the  inter-
national  market  with  semen  sales  across  the  world.  We’re  one  of 
the  largest,  if  not  the  largest,  sellers  of  breeding  bulls.  We  have 
more  bulls  and  semen  studs  than  anybody  else  in  the  market,  so 
we’re very active in it. 

Establishing  trade  guidelines  that  are  smart,  that  are  fair,  in 
this case that are responsible to consumers and producers is—could 
hardly be called protectionist. I call them responsible and fair prac-
tices, and, you know, it’s so funny, Senator, every time we get into 
this  debate,  these  folks  don’t  seem  to  be  able  to  debate  us  on  the 
issues.  It’s  like  a  bunch  of  little  kids  on  a  school  ground,  the  first 
thing they do is go to name calling. 

I’m very proud of what we’ve done. I’m very proud of what you’ve 

done. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Thank  you  very  much.  Mr.  Barth,  the  North 
Dakota  Farmers  Union  has  an  official  position  on  this  issue.  Does 
the National Farmers Union have a similar position? 

Mr.  BARTH.  Thank  you,  Senator  Dorgan.  Yes,  they  do.  They  be-
lieve  that  there  needs  to  be  protection  for  the  U.S.  beef  market; 
that  the  U.S.  beef  market  needs  to  be  protected;  that  we  have  a 
safe  supply  of  food  here  and  that  needs  to  be  protected.  As  you 
stated, we can’t import a problem. 

And also we call for mandatory country-of-origin labeling both on 
the  North  Dakota  level  and  national  level.  We  want  that  imple-
mented immediately. As you said, there have been many delays in 
that process of implementing country-of-origin labeling. 

Our  history  in  North  Dakota  and  the  National  goes  back  to  the 
early  Nineties  in  supporting  country-of-origin  labeling.  We  have  a 
long history there, and we believed that would be a part of the so-
lution  before  we  do  open  up  the  border  to  Canadian  trade  of  ani-
mals over 30 months of age. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Dr.  DeHaven,  we  just  talked  a  bit  about  im-
porting risk. Is it USDA’s contention that opening this market will 
not import risk, or is it your understanding that there will be some 
risk imported as a result of this? 

Dr.  DEHAVEN.  Senator,  we’re  characterizing  the  risk  as  neg-
ligible, again, looking at having done a thorough science-based risk 
analysis  consistent  with  the  OIE  standards,  looking  at  the  entire 
pathway and looking at the mitigations that are in place along that 
entire  pathway.  If  you’ll  permit  me,  I’ll  go  through  some  of  those 
steps  that  we  have  considered  and  those  risk  mitigation  measures 
that are in place. 

Senator DORGAN. I certainly will permit that. I’d also like you to 
comment,  as  well,  on  Canada’s  tightening  of  their  feed  standards 
and whether you saw that as evidence that the current feed stand-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  15:54 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 035813 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35813.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

37

ards  were  inadequate,  and  if  so,  did  that  play  a  role  in  your  judg-
ment? 

Dr.  DEHAVEN.  Certainly.  Our  risk  assessment  of  the  Canadian 
situation  and  the  risk  that  it  would  present  to  the  United  States 
begins  with  a  prevalence  estimate.  The  Canadians  have  imple-
mented an enhanced BSE testing program much like what we car-
ried out for 2 years beginning in June of 2004. 

They have tested a comparable—in fact, based on percentage of—
relative percentage of adult cattle populations, I think they’ve actu-
ally exceeded the number of high-risk animals that they tested. We 
used  the  exact  same  methodology  to  determine  the  prevalence  of 
BSE  in  the  Canadian  cattle  herd  that  we  used  domestically  based 
on our testing program to determine our prevalence. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Dr.  DeHaven,  I’m  going  to  apologize  for  inter-
rupting you, but I want to try to understand this as you go through 
it, and I think those who have come here would like to understand 
it, as well. You’re talking about prevalence. I want to ask the ques-
tion: Is BSE more prevalent in Canada than in the U.S.? If preva-
lence is a standard, based on what we know and based on existing 
cases, is it more prevalent in Canada than the U.S.? 

Dr.  DEHAVEN.  We  estimate  the  prevalence  in  Canada  in  their 
adult  cattle  population  to  be  6.8  positive  animals  per  ten  million 
adult  cattle.  That’s  somewhere  less  than  one  in  a  million.  Looking 
at the assessment that we did and prevalence estimate that we did 
for  the  United  States,  we  estimated  it  to  be  somewhat  less  than 
one  in  a  million.  So  they  are  certainly  in  the  same  ballpark  based 
on extensive surveillance programs in both countries. 

Senator  DORGAN.  But  the  answer  is  if  you  start  with  the  first 
point  being  prevalence,  currently  what  we  understand  is  there’s  a 
greater prevalence of BSE cases in Canada than in the U.S.? 

Dr. DEHAVEN. I can’t say that, Senator. 
Senator DORGAN. I thought you just said that. 
Dr.  DEHAVEN.  No,  no.  I  said  that  based  on  the  estimate  that 
we’ve done, which uses the enhanced testing surveillance programs 
in both countries——

Senator  DORGAN.  How  about  based  on  what  we  know  in  terms 

of confirmed cases? 

Dr.  DEHAVEN.  Based  on  confirmed  cases,  as  well  as  the  popu-
lation  of  negative  tests  that  we  have,  we’re  estimating  the  preva-
lence in Canada to be 6.8 positive animals, less than seven animals 
per ten million adult cattle. That’s somewhat less than one positive 
animal  in  a  million.  When  we  did  the  assessment  for  the  U.S.  na-
tional  herd,  we  estimated  the  prevalence  at  somewhat  less  than 
one in a million. 

Senator DORGAN. OK. We’re just discussing different subjects be-
cause  I’m  trying  to  ask  the  question  of  the  documented  cases  of 
BSE  in  the  two  markets.  There’s  a  greater  prevalence  of  docu-
mented  cases  in  Canada  than  in  the  U.S.  You’re  describing  a  test-
ing  regime.  That’s  not  what  I  was  asking,  but  why  don’t  you  pro-
ceed to the second point. 

Dr.  DEHAVEN.  Well,  I  will  concede,  Senator,  that  we  have  found 
two  indigenous  cases  in  the  United  States  with  all  the  testing  we 
have done. The Canadians have found ten indigenous or ten native-
born  cases  there.  I’m  talking  about  what  you  can  infer  from  a  sta-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  15:54 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 035813 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35813.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

38

tistical basis from that testing or from the testing programs in both 
countries. 

Senator  DORGAN.  But  if  I’m  a  customer,  I  look  at  the  United 
States and Canada and what I see is more cases of BSE being dis-
closed in Canada than the United States; is that correct? 

Dr. DEHAVEN. There has been, yes, sir. But I think for the entire 
picture you need to look at the statistical analysis of all of the data 
rather than drawing conclusions simply on the raw numbers of ani-
mals that have tested positive. 

Senator  DORGAN.  I  appreciate  USDA’s  advice  to  the  Japanese 
and  the  Koreans  and  others,  but  I’m  not  sure  that’s  the  way  they 
will  evaluate  that.  I  think  they  will  look  at  what  they  know  to  be 
the  case  in  the  United  States  and  Canada  based  on  what  we  have 
discovered in both countries. But proceed to the second point. 

Dr.  DEHAVEN.  OK.  Again,  Senator,  I’m  discussing  the  various 
measures  and  issues  that  we  considered  in  developing  that  risk 
analysis and upon which this rule was based. First was the preva-
lence, and while we can argue about the finite number of cases that 
might be in either country, needless to say 6.8 positive animals out 
of 10 million adult animals is a very low prevalence of the disease. 
Second,  we  did  look  at  their  feed  ban,  and  just  to  clarify  one 
point,  our  risk  assessment  was  based  on  the  feed  ban  that  cur-
rently  is  in  place  in  Canada,  not  the  enhanced  feed  ban  that  they 
plan on imposing. So our determination that there is negligible risk 
is  based  on  their  current  feed  ban,  and  their  enhancement  of  that 
feed ban can only improve the overall situation, continue to reduce 
whatever risk there might be. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Let  me  ask  a  question  about  that,  because  if 
the  Canadians  have  judged  their  feed  ban  needs  to  be  tightened, 
they  obviously  think  something  is  deficient  with  respect  to  what 
they were doing. Or at least that it should and could be improved. 
Did  you  make  that  same  judgment  when  you  looked  at  the  Cana-
dian feed ban? 

Dr.  DEHAVEN.  We  haven’t  looked  at  the  enhanced  feed  ban.  We 
conducted  our  risk  assessment  in  the  context  of  their  existing  feed 
ban.  I  think  this  goes  without  saying,  though,  that  the  enhance-
ments  that  they’re  talking  about  will  accelerate  the  time  that  any 
infectivity  in  the  Canadian  feed  will  be  eliminated  from  the  na-
tional feed supply. 

Senator  DORGAN.  But  you  gave  them  minimum-risk  status  at  a 
time  when  they  had  a  feed  ban  which  they  now  believe  needs  to 
be  strengthened.  Did  you  reach  that  same  judgment  as  you  were 
giving them a minimum status? 

Dr.  DEHAVEN.  Again,  we  have  based  that  minimum  region  cat-

egorization on the existing feed ban, not the enhancement. 

Senator DORGAN. And you felt the existing feed ban was fine and 

adequate? 

Dr. DEHAVEN. Correct. 
Senator DORGAN. And the Canadians apparently think it was in-
adequate  because  they  now  are  making  changes  to  strengthen  it. 
Dr. DEHAVEN. I think the Canadians are looking at a number of 
factors,  not  the  least  of  which  is  a  cost  benefit  analysis.  What  is 
the  cost  of  enhancing  their  feed  ban  compared  to  the  potential  re-
turn  that  they  might  realize  in  increased  export  markets  by  en-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  15:54 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 035813 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35813.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

39

hancing  that  feed  ban?  So  I’m  not  sure  that  it’s  necessarily  based 
totally on risk. It’s also looking at the cost benefit and long-term—
what that enhanced feed ban might do in terms of increasing their 
export markets. 

Senator  DORGAN.  So,  therefore,  the  Canadians  might  be  doing 
this  based  on  the  perception  of  risk  rather  than  risk  itself,  which 
gets  back  to  the  entire  point  that  I’ve  been  making  this  morning. 
This is all about perception, isn’t it, in terms of people who are in-
terested  in  purchasing  a  product  from  us  who  have  a  perception 
based  on  the  prevalence  of  cases  that  have  been  documented  in 
Canada versus the U.S.? 

Dr.  DEHAVEN.  Senator,  I  don’t  think  we  could  have  this  discus-
sion  without  considering  the  biological  sciences,  the  political 
science,  and  the  economic  science  of  the  whole  situation.  We  are 
doing so and I’m sure the Canadians are doing likewise. 

It really comes down to a cost benefit analysis on their enhanced 
feed  ban.  If  there  is  infectivity  in  the  Canadian  feed  supply,  and 
there’s evidence that there is, increasing the removal of SRMs, en-
hancing  that  feed  ban  will  accelerate  the  time  period  that  it  takes 
for them to totally eliminate that infectivity from their feed. 

We  would  estimate  that  just  having  the  ruminant-to-ruminant 
feed  ban  in  place  that  they  have,  like  we  have  in  the  U.S.,  will 
eliminate  infectivity  from  either  country’s  feed  supply.  Their  en-
hancements will accelerate that process. 

Senator  DORGAN.  But  the  point  is  they  didn’t  have  to  improve 
their  feed  ban  or  make  changes  with  respect  to  the  feed  standard. 
They didn’t have to do that because you would already allow under 
the current system 1.3-million head of Canadian cattle to come into 
the country in 2007. 

Dr.  DEHAVEN.  Well,  I  would  just  remind  you,  Senator,  this  is  a 
proposed  rule.  I  think  these  are  all  relevant  comments,  but  your 
premise  is  accurate.  We  based  the  proposed  rule  on  their  existing 
feed  ban,  not  the  enhancements  that  they  plan  putting  in  place  in 
July of this year. 

Senator  DORGAN.  So  the  Canadians  weren’t  worried  about  our 
perception because USDA’s perception was that their feed ban was 
fine. 

Dr. DEHAVEN. Well, in fact, we are not the only market for Cana-

dian exports. 

market. 

Senator  DORGAN.  But  1.3-million  head  is  a  pretty  substantial 

Dr.  DEHAVEN.  It  is  indeed.  It  is  indeed.  Continuing  then  with 
looking  at  the  entire  risk  pathway,  we  first  did  a  prevalence.  We 
considered the feed ban that they had in place, which again is con-
sistent with ours and has been in place for a similar period of time. 
Recognize  that  even  if  an  animal  is  infected  early  in  life,  it  does 
not  represent  a  risk  to  either  animal  health  or  public  health  until 
just  a  few  weeks  before  it  develops  clinical  signs  and  then  would 
be  excluded  from  the  feed  supply,  which  gets  to  the  Creekstone 
testing issue that is an entirely different discussion, but, in fact, an 
animal  that  is  infected  will  not  test  positive,  will  show  no  clinical 
signs,  and  represents  no  animal  health  or  public  health  risk  until 
just  a  matter  of  a  few  weeks  before  it  develops  clinical  signs  and 
then will die. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  15:54 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 035813 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35813.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

40

So part of the analysis is recognizing that there may be infected 
animals  in  Canada.  Most  likely  they  would  be  imported  into  the 
United  States  well  before  the  age  that  they  would  develop  clinical 
signs, well before they would represent any infectivity to our cattle 
herd or to public health in the United States. 

So,  again,  you’re  taking  that  prevalence  of  infected  animals  and 
further reducing the risk and that there’s a narrow window of time 
when  even  an  infected  animal  represents  risk  to  animal  health  or 
public health. 

Second,  when  the  animal  comes  across  the  border,  we  are  going 
to  remove  those  specified  risk  materials,  tonsils  and  that  distal 
ileum  from  animals  of  all  ages,  and  the  other  SRMs  for  animals 
that are over 30 months of age. So we have, in addition to the SRM 
removal, various slaughtering practices in place that will minimize 
that risk, ensuring that practices to recover some of the meat don’t 
include,  for  example,  nervous  tissue,  ensuring  that  stunning  isn’t 
used  or  a  pneumatic  device,  which  could  put  nervous  tissue  into 
the  meat,  as  well.  So  those  practices  are  in  place  to  protect  public 
health. 

On  the  animal  health  side  it  would  require—here  again,  an  ani-
mal  that’s  infected  that’s  in  that  narrow  infected  window  to  get 
into  a  rendering  plant.  That  rendering  plant  in  the  U.S.  is  going 
to  apply  procedures,  such  as  heat  and  pressure,  that  will  reduce 
any  infectivity,  and  then  on  top  of  that  we  have  a  ruminant-to-ru-
minant  feed  ban.  So  even  if  there  is  infectivity  in  that  feed,  it 
shouldn’t be fed to susceptible animals in the United States. 

All  of  those  breaches  would  have  to  occur  in  the  United  States 
to  represent  a  risk  for  a  positive  animal.  If  all  of  those  safeguards 
were  breached  and  you  did  end  up  with  an  infected  animal  in  the 
United  States,  I  would  just  remind  you  that  that  animal,  when  it 
goes  to  slaughter,  is  going  to  be  subjected  to  the  same  SRM  re-
moval  and  slaughtering  practices.  Its  tissues  are  going  to  be  sub-
jected to the feed ban and shouldn’t end up in animal feed. 

So, again, we are not looking at a single issue, such as the effec-
tiveness  of  the  feed  ban,  to  mitigate  risk.  We’re  looking  at  the  en-
tire  risk  pathway  and  in  doing  so  have  determined  that  the  risk 
to the United States from this rule would be negligible. 

Senator DORGAN. But, again, that ignores that risk, which is per-
ception.  And  the  other  thing  I  don’t  understand  is  we’re  talking 
about  all  these  dates  and  your  scientific  analysis.  One-third  of  the 
BSE  cases  that  have  now  been  discovered  are  cases  in  cattle  that 
were  born  after  March  1,  1999,  long  after  the  feed  ban  went  into 
effect. 

Dr. DEHAVEN. Mr. Chairman, excuse me for interrupting. No one 
is  ignoring  that  trade  gap.  It  is  real.  The  Secretary  understands  it 
acutely.  Everyone  in  the  Department  understands  that  trade  gap, 
and  we  are  working  mightily  to  overcome  that.  What  we  are  say-
ing—and  this  is  subject  to  your  comments  and  we  would  welcome 
them—is that the impact of this rule will be negligible on that gap. 
It’s not going to make that gap worse. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Dr.  DeHaven,  the  Secretary  is  ignoring  that 
gap. That’s not speculation. He is ignoring that gap by trotting out 
this  rule.  He’s  ignored  that  gap,  and  the  fact  is  there  is  no  econo-
mist in the world that will convince me that this rule and what you 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  15:54 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 035813 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35813.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

41

intend  to  do  with  respect  to  the  import  of  these  cattle  is  incon-
sequential  to  that  gap.  I  mean,  that  represents  a  very  substantial 
economic  injury,  and  I  understand  what’s  happening  there.  That 
has  to  be  a  part  of  the  evaluation,  and  again  I  come  back  to  the 
point,  I  don’t  understand  the  Secretary’s  urgency  here.  He  has 
seemed  so  anxious  to  get  this  done.  Well,  for  whom?  Why?  I  don’t 
understand it. 

And  I  do  think  with  due  respect  you’ve  come  here  to  make  the 
case of why you have done what you’ve done leading up to the end 
of  the  comment  period,  but  frankly,  I  don’t  think  the  explanation 
holds water. I just do not. 

I  described  the  size  of  this  industry  to  our  country.  I  described 
what  we  have  done  over  a  long  period  of  time  to  try  to  make  cer-
tain  the  world  knows  that  we  have  the  safest  beef  supply  in  the 
world,  and  I  do  not  understand  why  we  would  increase  our  expo-
sure, and I think the evidence is quite clear. We’ll increase our ex-
posure by rushing in this circumstance. 

The country-of-origin labeling is very important, and I’m going to 
find  a  way  to  introduce  something  here  very  soon  in  the  Senate 
that  will  try  to  prevent  USDA  from  implementing  this  new  rule 
prior  to  implementation  of  country-of-origin  labeling  in  this  coun-
try.  At  the  very  minimum—that  ought  to  be  the  first  step.  There 
ought to be country-of-origin labeling before we even whisper about 
this  sort  of  move,  and  yet  the  Secretary  has  been  so  anxious  to 
move so quickly. 

So,  Dr.  DeHaven,  you  are  someone  with  a  scientific  background, 
you’re a public servant. I appreciate your being here. We have very 
strong  disagreements,  and  I  think  you  and  the  Secretary  know 
there’s great anxiety out here in the country where people are try-
ing  to  make  a  living  about  what  has  happened,  and  this  chart 
shows  it  in  a  very  dramatic  way.  What  has  happened  is  very  con-
sequential. 

Let  me  thank  our  witnesses  for  being  here  and  for  your  entire 
statements. I know you’ve summarized. Your entire statements will 
be a part of the permanent records of the Commerce Subcommittee 
hearing.  Let  me  ask  you  to  go  ahead  and  depart  from  the  table, 
and  I’m  going  to  ask  others  who  may  wish  to  make  a  comment  to 
come  to  the  open  mike  so  that  they  can  contribute,  as  well,  and  I 
thank all six of you for being here. 

State Rep. Rod Froelich had asked to speak, and I believe he has 
introduced some legislation in the—is that right, in the state legis-
lature, Rod? 

STATEMENT OF HON. ROD FROELICH, REPRESENTATIVE 
(DISTRICT 31), STATE OF NORTH DAKOTA LEGISLATURE 

Representative FROELICH. Yes, Senator. 
Senator  Dorgan,  I’d  like  to  conclude  this  by  just  giving  a  little 
history. Senator Dorgan and guests, for the record, my name is Rod 
Froelich. My family has been ranching in Sioux County for over 80 
years.  I  have  a  15-year-old  grandson  who  will  be  the  fifth-genera-
tion rancher. 

Senator,  as  you  well  know,  I  represent  District  31,  which  in-
cludes  all  of  Sioux  County,  all  of  Grant  County,  one-half  of 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  15:54 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 035813 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35813.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

42

Hettinger  County,  and  a  large  portion  of  Morton  County,  which  is 
comprised of 3,710,000 acres and approximately 130,000 beef cows. 
My  constituents  have  been  through  blizzards,  floods,  tornadoes, 
droughts,  and  fire.  To  say  that  they  have  been  tested  would  be  a 
huge  understatement—not  tested.  Senator,  as  you  know,  we  raise 
some  of  the  finest  crops,  hardiest  cattle,  and  some  of  the  toughest 
people  in  the  world.  Of  course,  Senator,  you  are  living  testament 
to my words. 

Senator,  all  it  takes  is  a  little  common  sense  to  understand  that 
opening  the  border  to  Canadian  cattle  over  30  months  of  age  at 
this  time  is  not  a  very  wise  option.  Canada  is  still  experiencing 
cases of BSE. It is not in the best interest of the consumers or the 
producers  of  livestock  to  contemplate  such  actions  until  Canada 
has installed preventive measures to stop the prevalence of BSE in 
their country. 

Our  Far  East  trading  partners  have  seriously  restricted  the  im-
portation  of  our  livestock  products,  when,  in  fact,  that  cause  of 
their concern is created by our Canadian trading partners. 

Senator,  until  we  have  assurances  by  our  trading  partners  that 
our  commerce  will  not  be  hindered,  the  United  States  is  obligated 
to protect its consumers and its producers. 

Senator,  there’s  been  a  resolution  introduced  in  the  House  of 
Representatives, State of North Dakota, that has passed the House 
Agriculture  Committee,  it  has  passed  the  full  House  in  a  unani-
mous vote, and if I may, can I read it? 

Senator DORGAN. How long is it? 
Mr. FROELICH. Very short, sir. 
Senator DORGAN. Proceed. 
Mr.  FROELICH.  A  Concurrent  Resolution  urging  Congress  not  to 

allow the importation of Canadian cattle over 30 months of age. 

Whereas,  in  2003  the  United  States  border  was  closed  to  Cana-
findings  of  bovine  spongiform 

in  response 

dian  cattle 
encephalopathy, BSE, in cattle; and 

Whereas,  after  the  implementation  of  corrective  measures,  the 
border  was  reopened  in  2005  to  Canadian  cattle  less  than  30 
months of age; and 

Whereas, many fear that consideration is now being given to the 

to 

removal of the age restriction on Canadian cattle; and 

Whereas, cattle over 30 months of age which originate in a BSE-
affected  country  have  an  inherently  higher  risk  of  being  infected 
with BSE; and 

Whereas,  there  has  been  insufficient  time  since  Canada’s  last 
case  of  BSE  to  determine  whether  the  corrective  measures  imple-
mented  by  Canada  have  been  successful  in  preventing  the  spread 
of BSE; and 

Whereas,  the  United  States  cannot  afford  any  further  reduction 
in its share of the global beef market stemming from the American 
products that contain beef from Canadian cattle; and 

Whereas,  the  United  States  should  not  further  relax  its  already 
lenient  import  standards  until  it  is  scientifically  documented  that 
BSE  is  no  longer  a  risk  in  Canadian  cattle  and  there  is  inter-
national  acceptance  of  that  conclusion,  as  demonstrated  by  a  res-
toration  of  international  markets—like  you  said,  Senator—for 
American beef and beef products; 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  15:54 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 035813 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35813.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Now, therefore, be it resolved by the House of Representatives of 

43

North Dakota, the Senate Concurring Therein: 

That the Sixtieth Legislative Assembly urges the Congress of the 
United States not to allow the importation of Canadian cattle over 
30  months  of  age  until  there  is  scientific  evidence,  coupled  with  a 
sufficient time lapse, to ensure that any corrective measures imple-
mented to counter the incidences of BSE in Canada have been suc-
cessful; and 

Be it further resolved, that the Secretary of State forward copies 
of this resolution to the United States Secretary of Agriculture and 
to each member of the North Dakota Congressional Delegation. 

Thank you, Senator. 
Senator DORGAN. Rod, thank you very much. We appreciate your 

being here. 
STATEMENT  OF  ALLEN  LUND,  SECRETARY,  INDEPENDENT 
BEEF ASSOCIATION OF NORTH DAKOTA (I–BAND); COW/CALF 
PRODUCER 
Mr.  LUND.  Senator  Dorgan,  thanks  for  coming  up.  Thanks  for 
giving  us  this  opportunity.  My  name  is  Allen  Lund.  I’m  a  cow/calf 
producer  from  south  central  North  Dakota.  I’m  also  Secretary  of 
the  Independent  Beef  Association  of  North  Dakota,  and  I’m  speak-
ing on behalf of our member policy. 

I  stand  before  you  to  voice  my  opposition  of  opening  the  Cana-
dian border to live cattle and beef over the age of 30 months. If this 
is  allowed  to  happen  at  this  time,  we  are  further  lowering  the 
United States livestock standards in an attempt to allow more for-
eign beef into this country. 

Most  of  the  countries  that  we  exported  beef  to  now  have  their 
borders closed to us because of a cow from the State of Washington 
that tested positive for BSE. It didn’t seem to matter to our trading 
partners that this cow originated from Canada. Some of these coun-
tries  would  accept  our  beef  again  if  we  could  guarantee  sending 
them U.S. product. 

The  following  safeguards  need  to  be  put  in  place  before  allowing 
over-30-month-age  Canadian  cattle  and  beef  to  enter  this  country. 
Number one, we need the assurance that Canada is taking every 
possible precaution in eradicating BSE from their country. Some of 
the Canadian cattle that contracted BSE were born after Canada’s 
feed  ban  was  to  have  gone  into  effect.  We  have  recently  heard  of 
more contaminated feed entering Canada’s feed supply. 

Number  two,  we  need  to  regain  the  foreign  markets  that  closed 
their  doors  to  us  before  allowing  further  imports  of  cattle  to  enter 
this  country.  Failure  to  do  so  will  result  in  a  glut  of  beef  causing 
price devastation to our domestic livestock industry. 

Number  three,  mandatory  country-of-origin  labeling  must  be  im-
plemented. We will need this law to maintain and build confidence 
in  U.S.  beef  for  the  domestic  consumer,  as  well  as  the  foreign  con-
sumer.  It  will  also  act  as  a  marketing  tool  for  the  U.S.  cattle  pro-
ducer. 

To  put  it  in  a  nutshell,  it  is  too  early  to  swing  the  doors  wide 
open to the Canadian border. We need to put common sense ahead 
of politics and just say no at this time to Canadian cattle and beef 
over 30 months old. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  15:54 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 035813 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35813.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

44

Thank you. 
Senator DORGAN. Thank you very much. 

STATEMENT  OF  HERMAN  SCHUMACHER,  CO-FOUNDER, 
RANCHERS-CATTLEMEN  ACTION  LEGAL  FUND,  UNITED 
STOCKGROWERS  OF  AMERICA  (R–CALF  USA);  CO-OWNER, 
HERREID LIVESTOCK MARKET 
Mr.  SCHUMACHER.  Senator  Dorgan,  Herman  Schumacher  from 
Herreid,  South  Dakota,  but  I  grew  up  in  Zeeland,  North  Dakota, 
so I’m a local. 

Just  a  few  short  comments  and  maybe  a  question,  but  Dr. 
DeHaven  mentioned  that—in  his  statement  that  it  would  only  af-
fect the markets when opening the border to older-than-30-months, 
that it would only kind of affect the markets of the cull cows. Well, 
right now today I think cull cows in Canada, using U.S. dollars, are 
somewhere  around  25  cents,  and  here  they’re  in  the  low  40s.  So 
that devastation—but, you know, there might be another chart you 
could use, Senator Dorgan, and that would be one that would take 
you back 20 years, the dairy buyout. 

And  at  that  time  a  million  cows  were  slaughtered  in  the  United 
States,  and  in  the  first  week  in  running  an  auction  we  saw  a  de-
cline  in  the  feeder  market  of  up  to  $15  to  $20  a  hundred.  It  took 
almost  2  years  to  get  out  of  that  deal.  So  that  would  be  another 
economic model. 

And going back to Keith Collins, who I know pretty well, I think 
he  was  appointed  by  the  Reagan  Administration,  and  he  could 
surely  come  up  with  an  economic  model  there  that  could  probably 
serve you both. 

Thank you. 
Senator DORGAN. All right. Thank you very much. 
STATEMENT OF JAMES SCHMIDT, COW/CALF PRODUCER 
Mr.  SCHMIDT.  Yes,  Senator.  James  Schmidt.  I’m  a  cow/calf  pro-
ducer  from  southeast  of  Bismarck.  In  the  last  week  since  the  last 
cow that was tested—or last bull that was found with BSE in Can-
ada,  Mexico  has  dropped  their  rules  now  for  opening  their  border 
to  Canadian  cattle.  Beijing,  China,  is  another  one  that  has  abso-
lutely dropped their rules now for opening China. 

My  question  is:  USDA  people,  when  they’re  there  writing  these 
rules  for  us,  this  affects  us.  If  this  market  drops,  there  are  a  lot 
of  them  with  the  drought  this  year  that  are  actually  going  to  be 
out of business. But are they going to be out of a job if it backfires? 
No.  They’ll  still  have  a  job.  And  yet  we’re  the  ones  that  are  going 
to suffer for their decisions. So that’s all I have to say. 

Senator DORGAN. Thank you very much. 
STATEMENT OF JAMES E. KRUEGER, COW/CALF PRODUCER 
Mr.  KRUEGER.  May  I  speak,  Senator?  I’m  a  little  wobbly  now-
adays.  You  asked  why.  I  can  tell  you  why  Secretary  Johanns  is  so 
anxious  to  pass  this.  I  was  connected  with  Creekstone.  We  prom-
ised  them  several  thousand  cattle  a  year,  a  month.  Ryan  Meier 
called Johanns, wanted to do the BSE deal. He said, No. You guys 
are just a drop in the bucket. We’ve got to leave this to Tyson and 
Swift  and  the  big  boys.  So  right  away  I  said  that  guy’s  no  good. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  15:54 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 035813 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35813.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

45

And  this  whole  American  deal,  since  the  Democrats  woke  up 
when  we  got  some  power  back  there,  they’re  so  determined  to  get 
this  NAFTA,  CAFTA  and  SHAFTA,  I  mean,  they’re  going  to  do 
their  best.  So  you  fellows  down  there,  the  Democrats,  got  to  be  on 
their toes, because they’re going to be pushing midnight legislation 
through. Thank you. 

Senator DORGAN. Thank you. 

STATEMENT OF DWIGHT KELLER, VICE PRESIDENT, 

AMERICAN SIMMENTAL ASSOCIATION; COW/CALF PRODUCER 
Mr. KELLER. Senator Dorgan, thank you for holding this hearing 
and giving us an opportunity to speak here. I’m Dwight Keller from 
south central North Dakota, cow/calf producer. 

There’s  one  issue,  I  guess,  that  I’d  like  to  bring  up  to  Dr. 
DeHaven  that  he  did  not  address,  and  it’s  the  pharmaceutical  use 
of  blood,  and  I  know  there’s  a  big  concern  with  the  safety  of  the 
blood  that  is  put  in  the  medicine  that  is  not—if  we  commingle  the 
Canadian  cattle  with  ours,  the  only  really  safe  place  left  to  get 
blood  for  the  pharmaceutical  industry  is  the  United  States  and 
Australia,  and  so  we  are—and  that  issue  has  been  totally  avoided 
by  USDA,  and,  you  know,  prions  are—have  been  isolated  in  the 
blood. 

And  I’d  also  challenge  you  to  look  at  some  of  the  latest  research 
that’s been out in Europe that is being done on BSE, and that has 
not been considered in this rule, some of the latest stuff that’s been 
done. 

And the other point I would like to make is with the animal ID, 
they want to identify our animals so we can export them overseas, 
so  we  can  maybe  be  able  to  access  that  market,  but  we’re  going  to 
open our border and expect our people to eat all the Canadian beef 
and  we’re  going  to  keep  that  here  and  expect  our  people  to  eat  it, 
but Canada and Korea do not want it. So, I mean, what are we tell-
ing?  That  it’s  OK  for  our  people  to  eat  it,  but  they  don’t  want  it? 
So I think there are a lot of concerns and we are way, way rush-
ing into this, and I agree with Senator Dorgan that we need to step 
back and take a long look at this and we’re way premature in mak-
ing some of these decisions. Once it’s done, it’s too late to back up. 
We  need  to  take  some  time  and  maybe  it’s  2  years,  maybe  it’s  5 
years before we make these decisions instead of rushing into them, 
and the economics is self-explanatory. 

Thank you, Senator Dorgan. 
Senator DORGAN. Dwight, thank you very much. 

STATEMENT OF LARRY KINEV, COW/CALF PRODUCER 

Mr.  KINEV.  I’m  compelled  to  ask  a  question  of  Dr.  DeHaven. 
He—he  made  comments  back  to  history,  and  in  1997  when  we 
started our feed ban, USDA said that we’re going to do everything 
to prevent BSE in the United States that we possibly can, and our 
number  one  issue  is  going  to  be  not  to  import  beef  from  countries 
that have known cases of BSE, and somewhere along the line that 
changed.  Didn’t  they  say  that?  I  read  everything,  and  I  must  have 
read it in 14 different publications. Now we’re opening it up. 

And then you brought it up that somewhere along the line a cow 
is not horribly diseased until she shows signs of clinical symptoms. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  15:54 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 035813 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35813.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

46

If  we  take  the  blood  sample  in  the  slaughter  plant  and  the  cow 
shows  the  BSE  agent  in  the  blood,  is  she  not  a  BSE  cow  that  we 
have  to  report?  Isn’t  that  like  saying  your  girlfriend’s  a  little  bit 
pregnant? A BSE cow is a BSE cow, and we’re going to have to re-
port them to the world. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Dr.  DeHaven,  would  you  want  to  answer  that 

point? Your name, sir? 

Mr.  KINEV.  Larry  Kinev,  cow/calf  operator  from  Dawson,  North 
Dakota. And if we want to get any history before you start on this, 
I’d like to go back to December of 2003. When our Secretary of Ag-
riculture  announced  that  we  had  our  first  case  of  BSE  in  the 
United  States,  it  was  a  Canadian  cow  and  the  Canadians  were 
bragging  about  their  tagging  program  that  they  have  traced  back. 
Did she have that Canadian tag in her hand when she reported the 
case  of  BSE  in  the  United  States?  It  never  came  out  that  it  was 
a  Canadian  cow  until  it  was  leaked  to  the  press.  There  was  a  gag 
order out in Washington. They didn’t talk to anybody. Comment on 
that, too. 

Senator DORGAN. Dr. DeHaven. 
Dr.  DEHAVEN.  Could  you  clarify  that  last  point?  I’m  not  sure  I 

understand it. 

Mr.  KINEV.  Well,  my  point  was  that  it  seems  like  our  USDA—
and  I  have  a  little  bit  of  mistrust  in  them—seemed  like  they  were 
at  that  time  protecting  the  Canadian  industry  more  so  than  the 
United States industry. 

Senator DORGAN. All right. Dr. DeHaven. 
Dr.  DEHAVEN.  Thank  you,  Senator  Dorgan.  I  believe  there  are 
about  four  issues  to  address  in  all  of  that.  First  going  back  to  the 
historical  perspective.  First  case  of  BSE  was  identified  in  the 
United  Kingdom  in  1986.  We  knew  very  little  about  the  disease 
back at that point in time. So in 1989 we, in fact, started imposing 
import  restrictions  on  any  country  that  diagnosed  a  case  of  BSE. 
That  was  appropriate  at  the  time  because  we  knew  very  little 
about  the  disease,  how  it  was  transmitted,  what  tissues  and  what 
parts of an animal’s carcass represents risk. 

Someone  indicated  that  we  should  be  looking  at  the  latest  U.K. 
research. In fact, most of the research—because it’s been such a big 
issue  in  U.K.  and  other  parts  of  Europe,  that’s  where  most  of  the 
research  is  coming  from,  although  we’re  adding  now  considerably 
to that research body of knowledge. 

So,  in  fact,  we  have  made  a  change  and  we’ve  made  changes  to 
our import policy consistent with what we now know about the dis-
ease,  what  tissues  represent  a  risk.  We  now  know  that  it’s  pri-
marily  a  disease  of  animals  over  5  years  of  age,  even  though  they 
may be infected in the first few months of life. So, in fact, we have 
made some changes because we know much more about the disease 
today than we did back in 1986 when it was first diagnosed. 

In  terms  of  clinical  symptoms,  in  fact  what  is  happening  from  a 
disease standpoint is the prion that is believed to cause the disease 
only  starts  accumulating  in  the  nervous  system  tissues  just  a  few 
weeks or few months before the animal develops clinical signs and 
dies. 

So  if  you  have  an  animal  that,  in  fact,  was  infected  in  its  first 
few  months  of  life,  up  until  that  point  when  it  develops  clinical 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  15:54 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 035813 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35813.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

47

signs, for the most part that animal represents no public health or 
animal  health  risk.  The  prion  isn’t  in  that  carcass  in  any  quantity 
to  represent  any  risk.  It’s  only  in  that  latter  part  just  before  the 
animal  develops  clinical  signs  and  then  dies.  That’s  when  it  rep-
resents a risk. 

Senator DORGAN. Doctor, on that point, though, can I ask a ques-
tion  that  was  asked  previously?  That,  nonetheless,  if  tested  and 
discovered, is it an infected animal? 

Dr.  DEHAVEN.  Indeed.  That’s  the  third  point.  I  want  to  clarify, 
though, we are not testing blood tissue. We are testing brain tissue, 
and that infected animal that, in fact, was infected early in life will 
not  test  positive  until  just  a  few  months  before  it  develops  clinical 
signs and dies. We think in most cases about 3 months before. 

So that animal—there’s about a 3-month window when that ani-

mal may, in fact, test positive but be clinically normal. 

If  we  do  get  one  of  those  that  tests  positive,  indeed  it  is  a  case, 
it’s  reportable  just  like  the  animal  that’s  exhibiting  severe  clinical 
nervous system disorder, and we would report that. It’s not a blood 
test. It’s a test on the brain tissue. I wish we had a blood test, and 
there’s  a  lot  of  research  being  done  to  develop  that  so  that  we 
wouldn’t have to wait for an animal to die before we test it. 

You  know,  my  job  is  to  protect  and  promote  American  agri-
culture. I take that very seriously, and it’s both on the animal side 
and the plant side. We deal with wildlife issues, as well, but I also 
recognize  that  we  have  to  import  to  export,  and  both  our  import 
policies  and  our  export  policies  need  to  be  based  in  science.  We 
can’t  expect  those  that  we  are  trying  to  get  to  accept  our  products 
to accept them on any basis other than science, but in doing so we 
also  need  to  be  willing  to  accept  their  products  based  on  science. 
No one’s ignoring the economic gap there. We are working might-
ily  to  overcome  that.  We  can  argue  probably  all  day  long  until 
we’re  blue  in  the  face,  and  even  then  we  get  another  economist  in 
the  room  and  we’ll  probably  have  a  different  opinion  in  terms  of 
what  will  be  the  impact,  if  any,  on  that  trade  gap  from  this  room. 
No  one’s  denying  that  that  trade  gap  exists.  I  think  what  is  at 
issue here is—how will it impact that trade gap? 

Senator DORGAN. I have to be at the Capitol in about 5 minutes, 
so  if  there  are  a  couple  of  last  comments,  I’d  be  happy  to  take 
them. 

OF 

STATEMENT 

PRESIDENT,
INDEPENDENT  BEEF  ASSOCIATION  OF  NORTH  DAKOTA
(I–BAND); COW/CALF PRODUCER 
Mr.  BECKER.  Senator  Dorgan,  I’m  Patrick  Becker.  I’m  a  rancher 

PATRICK 

BECKER, 

in Sioux County, and I guess I just want to make a comment. 

When  I  think  of  the  United  States  of  America,  the  term  gold 
standard  was  used,  and  to  me  I  interpret  that  as  the  rest  of  the 
world—they view the United States as the best. They buy the best. 
This  is  lowering  our  standard.  You  know,  I  don’t  know  how  you—
what  kind  of  standard  you  want  to  name  it,  but  I  think  I  stepped 
in some this morning when I was checking heifers. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  15:54 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 035813 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35813.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

48

STATEMENT  OF  DOROTHY  ORTS,  PRESIDENT,  GALLOWAY
ASSOCIATION  OF  THE  NORTH  DAKOTA  STOCKMEN’S
ASSOCIATION; COW/CALF PRODUCER 
Ms. ORTS. I want to make just one quick comment. Dorothy Orts, 
Oriska,  and  I  think  I  figured  out  that  trade  gap.  When  Dr. 
DeHaven  said  we  are—we  are  hammering  our  trade  partners,  I’m 
a salesman and I have never sold anything by hammering my pros-
pects. 

Senator DORGAN. Thank you. 

STATEMENT  OF  KELLY  FROELICH,  DIRECTOR,  INDEPENDENT 
BEEF ASSOCIATION OF NORTH DAKOTA (I–BAND); COW/CALF 
PRODUCER 
Mr. FROELICH. Senator Dorgan, for the record, my name is Kelly 
Froelich,  and  I’m  a  rancher  in  Selfridge,  North  Dakota,  in  Sioux 
County, and also I’d like to clarify for the record that North Dakota 
Stockmen’s  Association  does  not  represent  me  and  thousands  of 
other cattle producers in this state, but I’d like to—back in the late 
Eighties I was attending college down at NDSU, and my instructor 
said  to  us,  imagine  sitting  in  the  confines  of  your  own  house  and 
a red light goes off on your computer telling you that, oh, your old 
number  favorite  seven  cow  is  calving,  and  we  thought  this  guy  is 
crazy.  What  is  he  talking  about?  And  it’s  just  around  the  corner. 
That  technology  is  just  around  the  corner,  and  now  the  red  light 
is  blinking  on  them  cows  up  in  Canada,  and  it’s  time  that  we  im-
plement COOL. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Thank  you  very  much.  I  want  to  thank  all  of 
you  who  come  here  today.  I’ll  recognize  Mr.  Gaebe  in  the  back  of 
the room here from Governor Hoeven’s office. We welcome you. 

We  will  keep  the  record  of  this  Subcommittee  hearing  open  for 
2  weeks.  Anyone  wishing  to  submit  testimony  to  become  a  part  of 
the  permanent  record  may  do  so,  and  we  would  invite  you  to  send 
it to my office or the Senate Commerce Committee within 2 weeks 
from today. 

I  thank  all  of  you  very  much  for  being  here.  This  hearing  is  ad-

journed. 

[Whereupon, at 11:55 a.m., the hearing was adjourned.]

Æ

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  15:54 Jul 06, 2007 Jkt 035813 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6611 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35813.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

